I have a feeling that the story "The day Mom stole all the cotton!" will get bigger and bigger, and that I made one of those memories that they will be talking about around the Thanksgiving table for years to come.
To add some color and pattern we fabric wall-papered the backs of the glass front cabinets. The fabric is a Joel Dewberry home décor. Jenny posted this project almost a year and a half ago (time flies!).
So I guess you know what I shall be busy with the next few weeks...
Back in the drawing room, a dead Varuna Gupta lay sprawled on the floor, her blue dress stained with the gallons of blood flowing down her neck. Her eyes were wide open, her right hand clutching an old revolver.
an alternative to this is just as easy and quick and requires no tracing or snipping with a pair of scissors. this method works best for pans like spring form ones with a shallow edge. it also uses a knife. if your concerned about damaging your pan through the cutting process, then you may as well opt for the traditional way of doing it. i've not had any problems using this method and not incurred any damage to mine.
Adams RH, Combes B. Viral hepatitis during pregnancy. J Am Med Assoc 1965; 192: 195-198.
Oh, and just to warn you. This project is going as slow as molasses. And we have already had several rabbit trails that we have gone off on on other projects, but that is for another day! I hope one day (hopefully by the time Karen's Party this summer) to be at least somewhat ready to show it off, but then again who knows with the way our life goes!! I am wanting to enjoy the process and not get caught up in a deadline.......
I love this tip from All Things Homie on how to make breakfast sandwiches for a crowd. Isn't this ingenious? This would be great to try over the holidays, or whenever you have a house filled with guests.
While it made me giddy to see my story on The Hoopla, I admit it also made my tummy tingle just a little. Who would read it? What if it puts off my next client or employer from hiring me? What if they think I’m a troublemaker?
UPDATE: Here’s more on the suit from The Wall Street Journal. The Trustee’s looking for $44 million, claiming that regardless of whether Ruth knew about or participated in the scam, she benefited from it and lived “a life of luxury” on the proceeds. This theory should cause Walter, Monica and all the filly(ie)s sleepless nights because the Noel clan is, at best, in no better position than Ruth Madoff. Just like her, they say that they knew nothing and who can blame them for living large? But if living a life f luxury on stolen proceeds is the test for restitution, do Round Hill cottages, villa’s in Mustique and $30 million yachts qualify? Why yes, I believe they do. Oh uh, Walt. Go, Irving!
I’d go to every now and then
"If I had just taken him to the doctor when he had a fever"
The second I found the Secret Agent L site I decided I wanted to be involved in a unique way. Because I am a puppeteer, I decided I would make a short, optimistic puppet video, burn it to a DVD, and leave it somewhere someone would find it.
Here’s my deal.
A hand-print lingers
Before we began the interview – which I'll be posting in two parts – Price mentioned a couple of fan letters he'd received – one in 1978, the other more recently. He then handed me a copy of that first letter – which you can see just below – with the words, "I don't think anyone has ever said anything nicer about me."
On the topic of Gnosticism, this idea has fallen out of vogue as of late. Though believing that Peter was not the author of 2 Peter, Bauckham lay this accusation to rest when he wrote:
Mick Foley says he saw what happened, but he had to see it through the replay because one shot took him out. He is a part of EV2.0, but there will be vengeance. The question is does he wait until he is cleared by the doctor in a few weeks, or will he do the “stupid” thing and fight the fight now? Regardless, he will side with Tommy.
Dh has suggested he does maths with D before he starts work each day and I do reading with him as and when. It will have to do I suppose. In the meantime I am going to use the slack time to catch up on some sleep or something. I have never been this tired before.
"Naked ewe"
We had no more than started down the narrow channel, and were commencing to make headway under our own power, when we passed the American Liner USS St. Paul, tied up to the RMS Oceanic which was lying alongside the dock. The suction created by our port propeller, as we made a turn in the narrow channel, broke the strong cables mooring her to the Oceanic causing her stern to swing toward us at a rapid rate. It looked as though there would surely be a collision. Her stern could not have been more than a yard or two from our side. It almost hit us. Luckily, the combined effort of several tugs, which had quickly made fast to her, pulled her stern back.
I became, for a short while, magical.
Our job as writers is to keep readers reading. Beyond that, we want to make them forget they are reading so they feel they are in the story and have a stake in the outcome. That's easiest to do in scenes, which consist primarily of action and dialogue with some internalization and description sprinkled in. But narrative, much maligned, is often useful or even necessary despite the bad rap it gets from the oh-so-often-repeated "show don't tell" rule we all throw around.
And of course there’s the much talked about wedding dress which had me doing somersaults of joy, although for different reasons to most. The dress itself I thought was lovely but predictable, however, the aspect of the dress that should be framed in an ornate picture frame and hung in the wardrobe of every woman that lacks curves, was the detailing on the waist… or rather, Kate’s non existent waist… Read on, I’ll explain.
Banaian said, “I was ending being the department chair and our daughter turned 16 and doesn’t need as much of her dad. We thought, ‘now’s the time to run.”
HSUS lapdog) promoting legislation
I'm doing beets today. There will be 3 different varieties this Spring. Chiogga, Cylindra and Detroit Dark Red are my choices this year. The carrots have already been done, there are 3 varieties of those as well. You can't find that at the seed store. Seed tapes are good for lettuce, parsnips and really any small seed that gets planted in quantity. I thought about cabbage and broccoli, but that just seemed a bit much.
Title: Neophyte
“I have been wanting to leave the house for months and he always prevents it,” she wrote. “He said if I leave he will kill himself or kill me.”
Katheryn Hebenstreitz recently distributed a missive reminding all Artisans that this year the Kingdom of Æthelmearc will host Pennsic 40! As always our King and Queen will travel to Pennsic and exchange largesse with another Kingdom. To date we do not know which Kingdom will receive our largesse basket. However you can still plan and begin to create your donations for the gift basket. Please see Katheryn's guidelines for suitable items.
My point is simple. Meeting parents is like meeting anyone new – that is either exciting, daunting, or in my case both. There is no rhyme or reason to determining who exactly I will develop the closest connections to. Sometimes location determines it – as with Dora. We walked past one another with our strollers several times on neighborhood walks before we exchanged numbers. I couldn’t have dreamed up a better neighbor mama friend. The first time we went to the library together, my son fell against a book shelf and split his eyebrow open. I dashed out and went home to get him cleaned up. By time I calmed down and checked back in with Dora, she had called the nurseline to see what I should be checking for. The tragedy/remedy of this happenstance cemented us together as friends.
I've heard that under these conditions it will very likely yield a BFN. I already have an appointment with Dr. Mac in the a.m anyway. He shall be drawing blood, so I'll know for sure in a few days anyway....
I explained that the people at Starbucks are paid to give us what we want, so, indeed, they would not only be on the naughty list, but they would probably also get a pink slip.
petition is involving. It gets your emotions, and sometimes you find yourself
For Kushiyaki, there is Waygu beef and Chicken skewers, each available in three different styles. It might be best to order the Harami Trio and Yakitori Trio, and get the chance to taste all three of each skewer style. The Harami trio come with wasabi, garlic, and miso while the Yakitori comes with yuzu, karai honey, and teriyaki. The beef and chicken were moist and tender, and the different preps were good, especially the elephant garlic chips and the karai honey. Their Tempura dishes generally come with different sauces, such as the Calamari with Korean chili and sesame cream reduction and the Shrimp with a spicy cream sauce. I would prefer to have my Tempura without such a sauce, but these dishes were still good, and I liked the spiciness of the sauces.
There is too much information for this independent researcher to collate and record and there is not enough time to gather contemporary images of the region for visual context. Please contact me if you have any images or information that you’d like to share and record for future readers of Furphy, his works and his world.
“Look, CoCo, I’m sorry if I didn’t tell you. . .I mean. . .Comi was worried about. . .maybe you saying something to Dallas-”
He reportedly massaged his father for a long while before leaving with the words: "I'm sorry. I'm sorry."
The machines homogenised everything. No matter how striking the prose, the little grey screen subdued everything to sameness... The sheer heft of a book in your hand ... is not only pleasurable but informative. You can tell a great deal just by the look and the feel. (Guardian - can't find a link, I'm afraid) I've so often said that it's the words that matter, not the trappings with which they're conveyed, but now I'm thinking I agree with Trollope about the Kindle. I got mine for Christmas but, although I've done a fair bit of reading to say that I've also been writing hard, I can't say I've used it much.
When he has friends over the problem is amplified.
Just noticed many of the links have mysteriously been pulled, have reposted the ones I'm aware of. I had to use blogger's spam filter to control the huge flood of rubbish in the comments & this seems to have removed nearly all of the real comments and many of the original links... go figure.
To the elected folks in Washington: We put you there this past 2010 to do what is right and to do our bidding. We can damn sure remove you in 2012 if you don't hold up to your end of the deal.
This morning I joined a group training for a 5K, a beginners group, using the running/walking technique to slowly build up to be able to run the 5K distance, it's billed as a Couch to 5K Program, and as we ran, I noticed that some were suffering during the running intervals, enduring the pain, then stretching, talking and smiling after the run, feeling that sense of accomplishment that comes after some good work.
And at first they didn’t cause no trouble, so we let ‘em go. Just making a living, like all of us. It wasn’t ’til 1910 that it started leaking out of the ghettos and the ditches and the railway bridges – y’know, all the places where people people who ain’t got no one like to hang out – that there were something to be afraid of.
Today’s flight involved 1,162 birds of 82 species. Even on a meager day, new birds can arrive, since it’s May. True to form, today welcomed Philadelphia Vireo to the tower list this season. Season total: 204 species.
Source: ThisDAY
I'm leaving it at that for today, because my copy of Diablo 3 came in the post today, and I'm going to spend the afternoon playing it! If my schedule plan works out, you should expect another post on Thursday! :)
I won't even describe to you the look on his face when he saw them. When I told him they were for his sister, he said, "uh.... they're....uh.... nice." I said, "what's wrong?" He replied, "I don't think she'll wear them."
Hate is as bleak as its namesake. Here you’ll find explorations of a man’s last moments before he takes his life, the embrace of the last halcyon moments before the end of a relationship and a plea for all to accept the fact that everyone’s heart harbors hateful intentions. All of this vitriol and self-loathing is couched in lush arrangements and laced with catchy choruses to mask its true intent, but this album is misanthropic to its core and all the better for it. It is a brutally honest exploration of what lurks behind our smiles and exposes the grim motivations behind our weaker moments. Hate is a walking contradiction that marries the most resplendent and ostentatious arrangements married to the most calamitous and desolate worldview and this conflict is the the source of its staying power and gravitas.
The Dog Finder and the Dog Casino are both rated as 2/3, meaning that they can be adjusted to make the puzzle more difficult to solve.
I was pleasantly surprised in the end to see that the feathers did indeed show up on the front, almost as well as the white on white on the back. I had expected that they would really disappear as the thread color was so close to the fabric color. My friend really loved the feathers, she said they looked very graceful.... Whoo Hoo!!!
Several years ago, the Florida Supreme Court ordered many court records be kept off the Internet until several issues could be studied further. Justices had concerns about how to deal with private information contained in many documents, such as Social Security numbers.
You are the prettiest girl
COINCIDENCES: (Battle Royale 2, The Informers) 2 movies within a week that were the last movie directed by the directors (before they died).
Boo + Boo Factory’s Christina Anton hand-makes her funky geometric leather jewelry in her downtown Los Angeles loft. Her background in architecture influences her unique, brightly-hued recycled leather creations. You’ll make a real statement in these intricately free-form necklaces, earrings, brooches, hairclips and rings inspired by scientific elements like molecules, cells, and vertebrae. Gotta see ‘em to believe ‘em. Prices start at $18. Go to BooandBooFactory on Etsy.
Edmondson: It was actuary one in Scarborough. It wasn’t actually a really bad hotel but the week after we left it, it fell into the sea. That s actually true (laughs).
Only government can afford to completely shut down to instal new computers. Any real business not covered with extorted money would be bankrupted by such a halt, but not the government.
"And her death is what you wished for, is it not?"
you could drive nails
Also wanna mention 540 Records continuing an entirely commendable and well-done re-unearthing of late ‘70s Oz punk label Savage; two more classic singles by Just Urbain and Young Identities to throw on the pile. And we’ll also give a quick mention of the Really Red “Crowd Control”/”Corporate Settings” 45. Some kind soul booted it, and, as someone who considers them one of the United States’ greatest hardcore punk bands ever……well, gosh, shucks, thanks.
Remember the Youtube group called Dude Perfect that made all those awesome videos shooting some of the worlds most impossible basketball shots? We’ll they’ve scored again only this time for Android. Instead of watching their videos on the go, how about play the game. Just recently released is Dude Perfect, an Android game based on the real-life dudes and you can get in on the Basketball action for only $0.99 today.
But for all of us, it means change. And big change starts with a small step. Just like Dave Kunst walking around the earth, it all started with the first small step. It took 21,000,000 steps, but he would have never taken the last step if he had not taken the first step. And that first step was just a tiny part of that 14,452 miles. But it was the most important step.
His recommendation? We shut down the PTO.. a.s.a.p. I am to close the PTO bank account immediately and turn all the funds over into the principal.
Style: German Pilsener
The great Dane impressed with another glacial pop tune. I’ve not quite come around to being unequivocally a fan of Oh Land, but I do love this song. As usual, it’s the percussion that does it for me.
FILM CREDITS
like a broken bird
Forgiveness is not the same as reconciliation. A fully restored relationship requires honesty on both sides. The Bible tells us “As much as is possible be at peace with all men.” We humbly, but confidently do what we can, but the results are not always what we would like. We’re blessed, at peace and learning to comprehend more who we are in Christ. Less and less do we need to buy into into the world’s coping mechanisms, or the excuses of those whose theology is strongly influenced by the need to explain disappointment. Possessing the peace that passes understanding sometimes means relinquishing the right to understand.
P.S. The new season of Work of Art starts tonight--love this show!
"Sorry kid, you've got to be 16 to buy reading glasses."
While it's called Weekend Herb Blogging we don't limit ourselves to just posts dealing with herbs - we celebrate vegetables, fruit, nuts, seeds, flowers, grains - in fact if it is plant based, then we'll love to hear more.
But it wasn’t. He stopped right in front of me, his butt almost in my face, and he leaned over and asked Pat if she wanted to dance. Shit. She didn’t care to dance with anyone, and he asked her to dance. Just my luck. So, Pat accepted, smooshed her cigarette out in the ashtray, stood up, and walked to the dance floor with him. The rest of us sighed. I was really hoping he would have asked me.
Let’s review some Customer Retention….facts…
Have to have Pay Day Loans – Here i will discuss Things to Know
It’s also called the Wavy-leaved Monkey Orchid, for reasons I cannot fathom. That name is neither memorable nor as perfectly descriptive. But once you’ve learned to identify a Naked Man Orchid, you’ll probably never forget it.
No, God is not in the wind. He is not in the rain. He is not in the thunder or the lightning. He is the still, small voice that commands them. God has no reason to shout His commands. The earth beckons at His word. It is all under His control.
Here is Today's "Coffee Friday Picture" to give you an example of what you can send! Remember.. you can be as creative as you want... The picture can be of coffee beans, mugs, coffee shops, coffee stains, funny t-shirts that say something about coffee, etc...
Sometimes I think that I should give Nokia a second chance. But with the number of mobile phone manufacturers in the market today, does that make sense? If Nokia couldn’t manage to convince a customer like me who doesn’t care too much about technology, how will they convince the geeky youngsters of today? Unless they can manage to somehow stop the nosedive, things are surely going the Kodak way!
One of the men died.
Not only am I a fan of short stories and flash fiction (I can't recommend Nik's flash anthology 'Not So Perfect' enough), I love films about people with superpowers (X Men, Spiderman, Batman etc) and I couldn't wait to get my hands on a copy. What I expected was a bunch of short stories about people with superpowers, something light and breezy - a loo book if I'm honest! - but what I received was an anthology of brain tickling, heart string plucking, eyebrow raising literary short stories bursting at the seams with weird and wonderful characters. There aren't any capes, costumes or lazer beams shooting from eyes in this wonderful anthology. Instead it's crammed full of strange foibles, odd thoughts, twisted relationships and unusual ambitions. Every time I dipped into it I didn't know what to expect but I was never disappointed. Each story is a delicious literary morsel.
Another note, while you may think to cut the butter to margarine or leave it out, don't because it really adds the only flavors to the chicken and will be very bland if omitted.
What one thing did you learn by writing a sequel? That I could do it! That I really could continue Byron’s story.
Alexis will be here in one week! Yay! We are so excited, as is our family and friends. I can't wait to bring this little bundle of joy into the world and start my life-long journey as a mother.
...yes, even worse than the clip from "The Hilarious House Of Frightenstein".
Toward the end of the seventh century and the beginning of the eighth, the leaders of the Muslim world began to speak specifically about Islam, its prophet, and eventually its book. Stories about Muhammad began to circulate. A warrior-prophet would justify the new empire's aggressive expansionism. To give those conquests a theological justification -- as Muhammad's teachings and example do -- would place them beyond criticism.
Shag eyeshadow (MAC)
The Melancholy of Haruhi Suzumiya is an exceptionally popular series, even overseas. It’s one of the only series in North America that has the big three: an official ongoing light novel translation, an official ongoing manga translation and an official anime localization (I can think of Spice and Wolf, but that’s about it). Newcomers to the series may find themselves a bit overwhelmed by the vastness of the media. Where to start? The novels? The manga? The anime? What’s the difference between the 2006 and 2009 series releases, and what’s all the fuss about episode orders?
As you can see I’m in really basic territory here, and for some reason a whole lot of images from old assignments have dropped in (unless you’re reading this after I’ve been messing around and fixed the code). I’ve realised that despite thinking I had a clear idea of what I wanted the site to look like, things became decidedly murky when it came to realising it. So confusion reigned at my house last week, something I’m certain my daughters didn’t appreciate…
In addition to the time opportunity, we had two incentives to head north from the Kieva homestead. The first incentive was the birth of our first great-grandchild, Bentley Edward Kieva in Sacramento, California. We arrived 12 hours after our grand-daughter Amanda, gave birth and spent a couple days watching baby Benny being passed around from one admirer to the next (including us).
Amit Bansal answers, You can focus more on projects and hands on experience. Look for internship options as well because all this will add value to your profile.
Film lovers whose knowledge of post-war Japanese cinema extends no further than the works of Kurosawa and Ozu might be alarmed at the graphic violence depicted in Masumura’s film. Others, familiar with the biting satire of Giants & Toys and the sexual shenanigans of Manji and Blind Beast, might be surprised at the greater visual finesse, range of emotion and youthful vigor of this early work. Technically, the film leaves little to be desired. Special mention must be made of cinematographer Kobayashi’s deep-focus photography, which captures every nuance of sets so gloomy and full of foreboding, that Dore’s illustrations of Dante’s Inferno leap immediately to mind. Each frame is so crammed with detail that the eye wants to linger even as the conscience is repelled by the spectacle of so much agony. Least of all are we prepared, in a film overflowing with so much gore, for the exquisite compositions and painting with light that recalls the etchings of Rembrandt.
Beauty is in the eye of the beholder.
Self:(lips pursed, wincing visibly)Well done....!
It was clear that the food-related-pregnancy-crazies had arrived at our apartment, and as I suggested he get his shoes on and head out to retrieve a pizza, he suggested I get on my computer and order another pizza and he'd go down and meet the delivery man in half an hour.
The referenceprise of the bluetooth is around ten meters. This lessens the choice that interference between device may occur. With this low sending, it is solace thinkable for the human to channelise bluetooth signals between obstructing walls.
After reviewing common white distortions in the media of this collective African-Canadian complaint,* Saney goes on to offer three primary and compelling reasons of his own for knocking To Kill a Mockingbird from its lofty perch:
Dr. Seuss' How the Grinch Stole Christmas (animated) ... ABC ... 8 PM
Not because today I am officially taking care of two little ones on my own, but because I miss her.
5. “Scream 4″ — $7.1 million
Without further ado, here’s day 6′s recipe:
It was a panda.
I have realized recently that I have always surrounded myself with people who dream up fun things to do. People who drop everything for an impromptu game night or a hike to the lake. They plan camping trips, create front yard slip and slides, and call for midnight dance parties. I have participated in many themed dinner parties, wild road trips, craft nights, and weekly rituals of Gossip Girl and wine. These people sign me up for knitting classes and they make me go water skiing even when I am too cold or too scared. Sometimes, they can even get me to go...shock..out to the bars. Simply speaking, these people force me to be social. WIthout them, apparently, my natural tendency is to hibernate, curl up with a book, enjoy an evening at home.
Revenge advice: When the annoying girl who for some reason hates you brings cake and will literally search the school looking for someone to eat the rest (even though I asked)…. make cupcakes and eat them every day with lunch. It’s a good thing I just made 3 dozen cupcakes. Samoas and York patties flavored. Yummy!
Remove the baking sheet from the oven and let cool for approximately 10 minutes or until you can handle it. Keep the oven temperature at 325. Using a serrated knife, diagonally cut the logs into 1/2 wide slices. Place the biscotti cut side down on the baking sheet and sprinkle with more cinnamon sugar. Bake for another 10 minutes or until golden brown on the sides.
Mark (who hadn't read the book) asked, But surely it must be saying something about America, and people said what they thought it was saying: that technological progress had destroyed people like the Bloods. Unfortunately, though, most people felt that the book did a disservice to that message by being too tedious, and I felt it did a disservice to those characters by subsuming them to the landscape.
Ok…. So I kept reading on all the blogs that the register rewards associated with the U by Kotex was still rolling. I have been really hesitant to try this after the Pepsi Next register rewards didn’t roll like the blogs were saying. Some people were blogging that it was probably working by region or by states. I wasn’t too willing to risk losing my register reward if it didn’t roll, like the Pepsi Next didn’t. But, of course, it is always in the back of your mind. So, I did it. I bit the bullet and gave it a try. IT WORKED! I rolled one register reward 20 times total at 3 stores. Each time, the new $3 register reward printed! I added a caramel to each transaction and paid .32 cents plus tax! WHAT A DEAL!
Brand New Neighborhoods Open
And now on to the other important stuff!
But you know what? I enjoyed it. I looked weird, and I know I did a LOT of standing around and staring, because I had no idea what was going on, but I enjoyed myself, I moved, and I laughed. And then, I went back on Thursday night. And then again tonight.
A few weeks ago there was talk that Israeli PM Binyamin Netanyahu had enlisted Nobel Laureate Elie Wiesel to pressure US Prez Barack Obama on Jerusalem, where 1,600 new housing units for Jews have been authorized against international law. Shortly afterwards, Wiesel published an ad in The International Herald Tribune, The Washington Post and The Wall Street Journal under the title "For Jerusalem." Basically it was a regurgitation of Hasbara clichés designed to explain why the Jews have more right to the city than others. The piece has been thoroughly picked apart and responded to elsewhere, so I'll only give you a taste of it before I proceed with my own critique of the paragraph that particularly irked me.
One tablespoon brown sugar
Unfortunately, however, one of the parallels with our past is that failed policies are sometimes intensified rather than abandoned. This happened with the pass laws, for example, before PW Botha finally repealed them in 1986. It may also happen now with the Employment Equity Act, with its provisions for heavier fines to enforce racial quotas upon all employers - when the Government cannot even get Denel, or Eskom, or SAA, or Transnet to meet its racial targets at management or skilled levels.
The Blank Screen can be a real issue for writers. We know that our job is to fill that screen with letters that make up words, that make up sentences, that make up paragraphs, and so on. We can talk about our inner editor being our nemesis - but, in reality, it's the Blank Screen. I believe Nora Roberts said: "I can fix a bad page, I can't fix a blank page." Because until you have stuff on that Blank Screen, you don't have a blog post or a story!
possibly the neat answers to these.
Pick A Number
Well, you’re right, we have predictable weather, too, and I suppose it could be argued that we have something resembling seasons. Y’know, Rain and Not Rain. And when the sun came out last week, I suppose it goaded me into thinking that perhaps we were on the verge of Not Rain (even though I know intellectually that Not Rain doesn’t begin until July). I got out the floaty, flimsy fabrics and scared the sunshine right off.
If that wasn't enough, she now frequents a local wild bird store and purchases high end bird seed!
In some ways it is like politics. Both sides can have a point or want different things, but if the two sides are talking, compromising and working toward a solution that works for everyone, then things get done. If it is all trash talking, bashing and attacking, then things become that much more difficult, take that much longer and often in the end leave everyone not as happy.
PS. If you were one of the lucky few to see the original photo, consider the experience to be the equivalent of having seen a Unicorn. Also, please know that you may be placed under house arrest for an indeterminate amount of time.
You are hyperactive and tireless. You've got more than enough energy to pursue all your passions.
ourboyds5(at)aol(dot)com
But I am a planner at heart. I love, love, LOVE making out plans for the new school year. I have to have a calender hanging up at all times. I never go to the grocery store without a menu for the week along with a grocery list made directly from that menu. So I found myself going back to the TOS planner over and over, looking it over, reading the description about it, pondering over other's reviews of it (all of which were good). Yet I still wouldn't allow myself to spend the money on something for me. I could make up some kind of scheduling form on my own, right? I could print out my own calendars, couldn't I? The kids could use some more notebooks and cute little boxes to hold all their stuff in more than I needed that planner. If I had extra money to spend maybe we should do a unit study on clouds instead of me buying something for myself. I've always wanted to do a study on clouds.
So nice to be back in the zone and I've a box load of new stash to get threw as well including the new Zutter Electric Distressing Tool. Not enough hours in the day and what with all the other unused stamps I've just found I should be in my element right now.
“Winning is great, sure, but if you are really going to do something in life, the secret is learning how to lose. Nobody goes undefeated all the time. If you can pick up after a crushing defeat, and go on to win again, you are going to be a champion someday.”
Poison by Hundred Year Flood
The authors analyzed the validity challenges from the first data set (1966-1982) to determine whether: 1) the court instructed the jury to apply one of the evidentiary standards; 2) the court discussed unconsidered evidence that a jury could have considered in evaluating invalidity; and 3) the jury determined that the validity challenger satisfied its evidentiary burden for at least one claim. Unconsidered evidence raised the inference that the jury applied a clear and convincing evidentiary standard, while a finding that there was unconsidered evidence raised the inference that the jury applied a preponderance of the evidence standard.
Restoration, Olaf Olafsson’s novel about the perilous intersection of international art dealers, illicit loves and a hidden vault on a Tuscan estate during World War II, covers forgery, tragedy and broken promises—all badly in need of remorse and repair. Kristin is a young art school graduate with an uncanny talent for painstaking restoration of Renaissance art. Alice is a British expat in Italy’s upper crust, closed Anglo communities who breaks with her crowd to marry a native of Tuscany. Robert Marshall is a devious, self-absorbed, brilliant and globally respected art restorer and procurer who authenticates paintings by old masters. The Germans are collecting museum quality art as fast as they can find it and the risk of dabbling in that market is worth your life.
Okay that last paragraph was a rant….I do apologize.
Now, I don’t know why Terror Lekota and his crowd call themselves Cope, instead of Cop. Anyway, let’s leave that snake alone because it actually is not the snake, but the old skin of the snake.
Lamb, J., Pepler, D., & Craig, W. (2009). Approach to Bullying and Victimization. Canadian Family Physician. 55, 356-60.
Vegancraftastic has a small range of hand-sewn Christmas stockings, from non-traditional (pirates!), to this one that epitomizes the classic image of Santa Claus, featuring a pretty, contrasting trim of Christmas lights:
“What we need to realize is that this is not just a problem occurring somewhere else, in another state, but it’s happening right here, in our small towns, in urban areas, in communities all across Oklahoma,” said Humphrey. “Last year this same program featured a home in Muskogee, and soon will focus on a home in Edmond. These are often last ditch efforts to save a person’s home from being condemned, to save them from losing their children, their spouses, their loved ones and animals. We need to become more educated and aware of this largely hidden phenomenon before it becomes deadly or causes a health risk to neighbors.”
He may not always be paying 100% attention, but when I need him most or I'm scared, he's there for me 110%.
Battersea Dogs & Cats Home
***If you are saved, you are God's child, spiritually speaking. Those who are not saved do not belong to God's family, so they are not His children. They belong to their father, the devil. But, He does love each and everyone of His creatures, just not the sin of His creatures. Aren't you glad He forgives us when we ask?
Did I live? Did I love? Did I matter?
Good afternoon everyone.........I bet you've been waiting to find out who the lucky ladies are that will be joining the Kenny K Design Team as of Jan.
Newt Gingrich
Nope. I found a pulse.
Anyway, we had awesome seats and an awesome time. And what was even more awesome was when, at the end of his show and before his encore performance, David announced for the first time that he will be serving a full-time mission for our church, The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints. It was such a special moment and everyone stood up and cheered, bringing him to tears. It was good time!
You should flaunt this gift, oil it and let it gleam
I cannot think of any performance in this movie that I didn’t love. It’s a star-studded cast and I expected no less from them. They didn’t disappoint. Steve Carell has shown us his comedic side and his dramatic side plenty of times before, and he pulls of both here fantastically. I also like seeing him play drunk, because it’s usually really funny. Ryan Gosling is probably the reason women would want to see this movie, and he gets his shirt off and shows the world that I am his body double. Julianne Moore is Carell’s opposite in that she’s known for being a fantastic dramatic actress, but has done some good with comedy as well. Emma Stone is great times to look at, and does a great deal of comedy as well. I tend to always find her very charming. Analeigh Tipton had unconventional good looks in this movie, but is still very attractive. I kept thinking she looks like a younger, brunette Riki Lindhome, and that’s alright by me. She also gives a very real performance in this movie. I think Marisa Tomei tended to steal the show every time she was on camera. She wasn’t in the movie that often, but when she was she was pretty hilarious as she completely flipped out over thinking Steve Carell had lied to her to get her in the sack, although I’m fairly sure he didn’t.
‘The European Commission on Monday dismissed as unfounded and speculation a report published by Spanish daily newspaper ‘El Pais’ alleging that the European Commission was examining a massive Marshall plan to boost economic growth in the Eurozone, worth 200 billion euros.’
How this plays out nationally will decide how we elect Member’s of Parliament at the next General Election. Instead of being considered as part of a carefully thought through debate, with all the arguments well known by both sides, the No campaign has focussed on Nick Clegg’s broken promises and the effect of AV on the BNP, whilst ehe Yes campaign has avoided Nick Clegg and concentrated on the BNP’s adherence to FPTP.
We are very sad to be losing our teamie Audrey who has been part of the team since the beginning.
2. What keeps you up at night?
2. Prelude to 'Omar Khayyam' 6:36
Usually, we hold on to the past as we think that gives us identity and focus in the future looking for fulfilment and finally we lose our true identity and our true purpose which are in Christ.
In this sense, like Mersault, Kanye’s endorsement of the haters only serves to show him that what he is doing is right: artistically valuable, morally upright and commercially successful (I use Kanye for shorthand to refer to the ‘narrator’ in ‘Power’, who, given the subject of fame, music and power in the song, is a fair approximation of the song writer himself). In a world of bland uniformity, eliciting a reaction, especially one as powerful as hate, is success. If Kanye feels hated, he feel successful: he is encouraging a reaction in his audience. Like Mersault, on a superficial level, hate at least means you’ve made a difference, an intense one, too: when the haters disappear, so do the lovers.
Below is a schematic of a LFTR (Liquid fluoride thorium reactor) or Molten Salt Reactor. Salt stays in liquid over a wide range of temperature (1000° degrees) versus only 100°C for water. Molten Salt reactors would also run at a low pressure. The bottomline is that using salt and eliminating pressurized water in a reactor makes them much safer.
Also up for grabs this month is our Top 3 badge- it may not be until after Christmas, but we look forward to visiting your blogs and seeing what you've created for the challenge... then selecting our favourites! This badge is only offered when we have 12+ entries.
Instead, Ivan thinks about TV shows he's seen and about his friends Stella, an elderly elephant, and Bob, a stray dog. But mostly Ivan thinks about art and how to capture the taste of a mango or the sound of leaves with color and a well-placed line.
I Love to make this card, It's simple but look great, LOL
Spring cleaning comes once a year to most, but being a mom, I found out Spring cleaning is an everyday chore with little toddlers running around! So, I was looking for safe and Eco-Friendly cleaning products that would work great with my children's sensitive skin. Attention Mommies and Daddies, I found those perfect cleaning products at Baby Harmony.
In my dreams
There is no issue more serious than war. Wars result in the loss of life and property. Wars are also expensive and an enormous economic burden.
she is such a curious little thinker.
This Thanksgiving Week, I am thankful for:
Sometimes I wish I had the ability to relive my life’s best moments. But maybe it’s good that I can’t. Because although torturous, yearning is also beautiful. Because it makes us confront our own fragility, the fact that everything is temporary, while also reminding us that there is something that transcends this life.
Book 1
It is very difficult for me to help The Geej with her school work. She doesn't read directions and then gets PISSED when she has to do her work over. She also goes nuts when I try and help her. Then I get frustrated with her, and it just escalates. She's in 2nd grade. This pattern does not bode well for the future.
A long time ago when I was a kid around my kids age, my dad was here. He worked for the Coast Guard here on Alameda and I never really knew about his life here or what it was like. My father passed away in 2007 and by that time I hadn’t talked to him in 10 years. I’m hoping to connect with him again in a way that will rekindle things that I loved about him as well as express that to my own kids.
This week Susan May Warren talks about overcoming guilt. Tricia Goyer gives her thoughts on the power of thoughts. And Pat Ennis gives us insight on spiritual growth.
When you look at the least wealthy in society, and there are a fair few of them (more people earn less than the national average wage than above it), the pile it high sell it cheap business model affords the widest prosperity the largest group of people. People who can afford to celebrate with a bottle of Champagne because the likes of Tesco flog them cheap, but otherwise would not. Knocking the poor appears to be the current zeitgeist of society. How else do we explain the acceptability in referring to people of low income whose tastes may appear vulgar as chavs? You can possibly explain my own dislike of middle class values as having their origins in my own working class childhood. When it boils down to it, university, a professional occupation, a posh lass under the duvet does not alter the tribe to which you belong and I remain one of the chavs and if I’m honest I enjoy offending people with the vulgarity of my freedom of choice. I like that people don’t like it.
Interviewed on Fox News Sunday, Rep. Peter T. King, a New York Republican, accused the newspaper of compromising national security when it exposed a Treasury Department program that attempts to track terrorist financing by secretly monitoring worldwide money transfers. The program, instituted after the Sept. 11 attacks, bypasses safeguards put in place to ensure against government abuse.
Unlike the common cold, strategic business problems won’t just “run their course” and disappear with the empty Kleenex boxes in your trash.
It all makes for a fabulous day out in the lovely Staffordshire Moorlands, enjoying what can only be described as a step back in time.
To be truthful, 2012 is turning out to be a crappy year and it's only March! I think I've heard enough bad news to see me through 'til 2013.
Stress can lead to increased belly fat - Too much stress causes the hormone Cortisol to flow in your brain and body. Unfortunately, Cortisol sets off cravings for sugary foods and thus lead to fat accumulation in the abdomen.
So to help this mission Digi Darla is allowing a second entry into this week's challenge using Susanna Shopper as the focal. So, not only do I get to work on my digital stamp and coloring skills, I get an extra chance to win the prize! Can't beat that!
Texting
856 ***D-V/7/1983. “Who’s Boss? Medicine and Law–An Ordering of Principles.” Second Annual James Stone Lecture on the Philosophy of Medicine, Grand Rounds, Department of Surgery, Michael Reese Hospital, Chicago, Illinois. Organized by Dr. Richard A. Shapiro (Incorporated in Item B-5, above, pp. 389-98 (1992).)
And that thy love we weighing worthily,
We went to the waiting room, Paul ran downstairs to Starbucks, and it seemed in no time the doctor came out to tell us everything went great. The nurse called us to recovery, and we got back to him before he was awake. This was the hardest part for me. It would have been very easy to sit and cry, (even though he was done). No matter how short and simple a surgery is, it's still overwhelming to see your baby laying there asleep with tubes, wires, and an IV. It was also overwhelming to see all the other little kids in recovery. But I knew G could wake up at any time and I didn't want him to see me crying, I wanted to be his happy mom when he woke up. We were in pre-op with a little 4 year old who, based on bits of the parents conversation with the nurse, I could tell this was not his first surgery or first hospital stay. When his doc asked him if he knew what he was going to do today, the little boy said, "You're gonna send in a spaceship, and the spaceship is gonna shoot bombs at all the germs, and then when I wake up I'll be in the popsicle room." What brave little kids there are out there. In recovery we were right next to them and I asked how the spaceship did. His parents said "really well" and they asked how Garrett was. It makes me so thankful for my healthy kids, and hurt for ones that have a lot of challenging health problems.The nurse explained eating, giving pain meds, nap time, bath time, how to take off the bandage, etc. Then she showed us the goods. Right as she finished, he woke up. Not only did he wake up, he almost shot right out of the bed. Luckily the nurse was ready and was able to remove the mask, and control all the tubes and wires so that he could crawl right into my arms without any obstacles. He was so snugly, and didn't cry a bit, nor did he try and rip the IV needle out of his hand. Both of which surprised the nurse. The nurse gave him some apple juice. In the pictures it looks like he's asleep with the bottle in his mouth, but he was gulping that juice down. He's never drank so fast in his life. He finished and was sound asleep. We were in post-op for about a half an hour and then we headed home. He didn't wake up until 2 hours after we got home.We're 12 hours post-surgery as I'm typing this, and he's totally been his normal, goofy, happy, active self all day. 2 good naps, 2 doses of pain meds, 2 poops, 3 or 4 pees (that didn't seem to burn), a lot of fluids, and some dinner. That's about right. We're just hoping for a full nights sleep and a slow day at home tomorrow, that will include 4 soaks in the tub. That's the part I'm worried about. How do you make a 16 month old soak in a tub 4 times a day, for 15 minutes at a time, for a week, while you're also watching a 3 month old?? My mom is here til Wednesday morning...I'm hoping she'll stay an extra couple days just to be on bath duty.
Than a kid who's stumped by a logician.
In order merely to keep food on the table for this mob, the father and head of the household, a goldsmith by profession, worked almost eighteen hours a day at his trade and any other paying chore he could find in the neighborhood.
- “The figurative language of the prophets is taken from the analogy between the world natural and an empire or kingdom considered as a world politic. Accordingly, the world natural, consisting of heaven and earth, signifies the whole world politic, consisting of thrones and people, or so much of it as is considered in prophecy; and the things in that world signify the analogous things in this. For the heavens and the things therein signify thrones and dignities, and those who enjoy them: and the earth, with the things thereon, the inferior people; and the lowest parts of the earth, called Hades or Hell, the lowest or most miserable part of them. Great earthquakes, and the shaking of heaven and earth, are put for the shaking of kingdoms, so as to distract and overthrow them; the creating of a new heaven and earth, and the passing of an old one; or the beginning and end of a world, for the rise and ruin of a body politic signified thereby. The sun, for the whole species and race of kings, in the kingdoms of the world politic; the moon, for the body of common people considered as the king’s wife; the starts, for subordinate princes and great men; or for bishops and rulers of the people of God, when the sun is Christ. Setting of the sun, moon, and stars; darkening the sun, turning the moon into blood, and falling of the stars, for the ceasing of a kingdom.”
Now, why would these studios take such a risk? It’s for the fans of these cahracters .The people who ahve been waiting for years to see something like this. Sure there is money to be made, but it is for the fans. Also, it’s just awesome!
I can still feel the sunshine, as we woke up in the morning to my parents backyard surrounded with bright colored flowers and shade trees. We sat in my dad's jacuzzi with our morning cup of coffee.
I will tip my Hat to ya for now,
The obvious counter to this is to argue that the clothing being banned is not the clothing equivalent of a rational argument that bothers those who disagree. Rather, the clothing is on par with someone shouting vulgarities in class. If this is so, the code would seem sensible.
It has been a scary week, but I am fully aware that my family is very blessed. After all, my dad and John are both still with us and according to the doctors that in and of itself is a miracle.
In fact, I'm starting to feel a bit like the proverbial moose in the GOP's helicopter lights. *BLAM*
And to all of those still in the trenches, my heart aches for you too. You deserve nothing more than happiness and light in your lives. The women I have met along this journey are some of the most beautiful women I know and although I'm not around here much anymore, you are never far from my thoughts and my heart. I do remember.
Will insisted that we needed to add glitter to the seaweed as his teacher would absolutely love it if we did, (a women after my own heart LOL!) so here he is with my quickie glue pen, drawing on lines for adding his next lot of glitter.
Until they moved me.
This from his grandson this morning.
As hard as we try for the rest of our lifetimes, we never can recreate what we gained and lost within that first kiss. For held within the second our lips touched is one last exhalation of childhood; our last glimpse of Neverland: the place where nobody dies and the way we feel goes on forever.
really, i dind't appreciate what i had and what i need.
Trending: Upward Fast.
Who doesn’t know about the POLYMANGA festival yet? … I didn’t until a few days ago. But now I know: It’s a manga festival in Lausanne that also includes a huge anime section and concerts. I guess it evolves all around anything Japanese pop culture and bande désinée. This year it’s taking place from April 7th to 9th. Now that I know about it I can’t help but go. Maybe you’ll have the pleasure to read more about in a later post! It seems that the French part of Switzerland has quite a vivid manga/anime and bande désinée culture. And it’s amazing how little we in the German speaking part know about it… So people: Communicate and get connected! Across and within national borders! So that our future may be more ANIME!!!
Right now I seem to need a little control, to feel like I own my knitting rather than it owning me, and the easiest way I know to regain control is to finish wips.
This lede, combined with our revised mission, is our overall and overarching theme for this project. As a group we reported on the Animal Science research program at the University of Missouri, specifically focusing on the nutrition research conducted by Nick Minton. We also describe the importance of the professors and the grant money they acquire for their students to do this research. We also explain the impact of this research on those who consume meat products. Overall, we wanted to show the importance of this program, which typically tends to go unnoticed.
They practiced frequently. Typically John would come up with the basic song ideas: the structure, lyrics and melodies, and then bring them to rehearsal where Ash and Mick would help form them into completed songs. It came to their attention that another band in the area was going by the name The Classics, so they changed theirs to Backseat Romeos, which was the title of one of their songs.
human is formed. Or you
image from Pinterest
i was telling my mama that i wanted to get a good citrus juicer the other day. i have a little glass one which is great for little bits of juice here and there but i wanted to step up the OJ production around here a bit since fresh orange juice cannot be beat.
by Sir Arthur Conan Doyle
First things first. I snagged a cute binder from my second home, Target, and added some lettering to the cover, to label the contents.
Maybe a shoe post is in the future...hum...
I am nearly 60 pounds lighter than I was that day. I am curious to see how I react . What are my feelings this time? I doubt I will stand in the background as I did last June… I doubt that I will have trouble resisting the nosh that will be passed around… Still self-image is hard to change in just 50 or 60 pounds… Scars are still raw….
Jayne Woodhouse has, once again, done a wonderful job with this story. A number of the established characters are beautifully developed further - notably Wilf, who gets the opportunity to show his warmer and wiser side without losing any of his lovable crotchetiness, and Anna, whose hurt reaction to her Dad’s behaviour is entirely convincing - and whilst it touches on unemployment, potential family breakdown, mental illness, and the plight of juvenile carers, And Rocky Too never becomes a book about issues. It’s very much a book about people.
Why wouldn’t do this now? Why should I wait for the end?
8. Come Around ft. Termanology & Royce da 5′9 (produced by Statik Selektah)
Here's a finished segment. I applied two coats of Polycrylic for protection from little boys' toy cars and messy hands.
Serve hot with lots of crusty french bread for soaking up sauce and a ton of napkins because after all that shrimp peeling your hands are going to get messy!
is after Sadie has seizures,
For next time around, I think I'll cut the sugar in half, or at least by a third, and replace the 1/3 cups of almond meal, sorghum, & quinoa with a cup of either the buckwheat or sorghum. I'll omit the flaxseed, too, in hopes that the "crunchy" goes away.
At which point they all join in, wandering around on their knees like a cross between Yoda and Dobby the house elf and saying "cup of tea, plant to water, mummy happy" over and over again.
woman," she says. In fact, Bush believes that there's "a
The cookie monster, Santa,...Dobby!!!
On two former occasions, Pat had attempted to send sounding balloons into the upper regions of the earth's atmosphere. Each of these had consisted of the usual two gas bags, a smaller inside a larger. It had been estimated that the outer bag would burst at an altitude of sixty miles, well into the nitrogen layer that exists above the stratosphere proper. When this occurred, the smaller, inner bag would act as a parachute, and descend gently, with its attached container, in which Pat had placed his newly improved set of instruments for the recording of cosmic-ray activity.
I want a Subaru like the one below.
Rome is both beautiful and busy.
Whenever I go shopping for furniture, there always seems to be those long vintage end tables but they don't sell that well to be used as end tables these days although I think they still make great end tables. So I was thinking of another way to use them. Here is a piece I am working on - it is one of those end tables but it has spindles on both sides and not a drawer in front so you can actually turn it sideways. Paired with a tall mirror, it is great to be used in a foyer or hallway. Or these are also great to use as bases and put a cabinet, shelf or hutch on top and it really can look like one piece!
My dad turned 50 on January 30th, but we celebrated his birthday with him this past weekend when he came in town and stayed with us for the weekend. I wanted to surprise him with something really awesome for his gift since turning 50 is a pretty big deal, so we ended up getting him a Sony Tablet (he saw one at the Sony Store a few months ago and went on and on about it)! My Grandma Dottie (my dad's mom) contributed to the cost of the Tablet, which made this gift possible-- thank you, Grandma! My dad was totally shocked when he opened his gift, which made me really happy! After opening presents, we went to dinner at The Cheesecake Factory. It was SO yummy, as always!
Lieber said the challenge was to determine the “appropriate level” of risk and return to the private sector. He said the city engaged the real estate firm Cushman & Wakefield to assess the viability of the project.
i love playing scrabble, & i love repurposing scrabble tiles as decor. i bought several extra scrabble games at garage sales just for the tiles! i used them as place cards for thanksgiving dinner last year, & as food labels for our game night coffeehouse in april [someday i'll have to blog about all the parties i throw here at the casa].
Finn’s lawyer argued another Diocese official was designated as the mandated reporter, which meant Finn did not have to make a report himself. That individual, Monsignor Robert Murphy, was the one who ultimately did report Ratigan to police.
OK, things have been busy with other projects and "real life", so please accept my apologies for the lack of activity with the magazine.
I love my Dad because he loved me first.
ANYWAYS-- the point of that was to tell you, I had a legitimate excuse for the lack of post last Saturday.
Here's a reminder of what is to be had in the way of prizes!
1. Lovesick Blues
Natural resources, facilities, institutions and public utilities shall be publicly owned, and the state shall invest and oversee their management for the benefit of all people, and the citizens’ duty is to protect them.
He unlocked the main door and stepped inside the cool house. Just as he reached the lobby Sameer spotted the daughter in law of the house cutting veggies.
While I can more than appreciate the homaging of the non-vocal era of cinema, The Artist didn’t do quite as much for me as to seems to have done for the greater part of cinephiles. I’m well aware of the endless praise it got, and I’m sure many eyes were rolled reading this, but unless you wanted me to lie about my opinion, I guess we’ll just have to agree to disagree.
This coming April, Louisville will once again host the American Distilling Institute's annual spirits conference. From April 1-4 2012, craft distillers will gather to talk about the craft, business, and future of new American distilleries.
I know I want to feel her again. To have her, once more, in my arms. And it is with this desire that I deliberate calling her at such a late hour when I can’t help but notice the time on my phone. I think subconsciously I wanted to see the time right then. I think subconsciously I knew what I would see.
In addition to the paintings and photographs displayed on the railings, artists with 3-dimensional work, sculpture, ceramics, textiles and jewellery will be able to display their work in the vicinity of the Leas Cliff Hall with the kind permission of the management.
Hey, a girl can hope! (When I worked in non-profit years ago, George Michael did stand in the doorway of my office on a tour.) And, I think George is in town filming his return to ER... :)
If you want to know who I believe, well... I know that the percentage of CO2 is about 0.038 per cent of the atmosphere, and they are talking about an increase representing only the tiniest fraction of THAT as a cause for concern, so I don't even need to say that my *ss is freezing off these days.
DJ kissed the top of her head, “Your son was right. You’re going to ‘out strong’ us all.”
A quick trip out to the glue-pot, a sample, my microscope on x400 and what do we get? Well, it’s looking good – many cells/spores and a few elongate/fibrous structures; pretty much exactly as in the rather better pictures above, and many others found on the Web.
However, it was the Helbling name on an auction ad published last week in The Redwood Falls Gazette which initially attracted the attention of my mother who phoned me about the auction. Redwood Falls is located between the Upper and Lower Sioux Indian Reservations and within the geographical area where, 150 years ago, the U.S. – Dakota War of 1862 erupted. I expect residents of that region, including New Ulm, will be especially interested in the Native American artifacts from Minnesota.
My next blog will focus upon taking the concept of the Core Addiction Syndrome and examining the common mind altering chemical and behaviors that can activate the syndrome.
1 tsp poultry seasoning
your iron horses. You were immortal. There was
OR: High resolution pictures of cottages.
Tom Waits – Downtown Train – RainDogs (1985)
Spirit teach me how to understand …
experimental. cultivating courage. overcoming web shyness. almost famous. years ago, a previous lover handed me a collection of poems by emily dickinson and told me not to be her. publish while you are alive, he said, don't be found dead next to a stack of your never seen work. see me here. perhaps i will not have fortune from my work, i will settle for fame.alive.
My summation is this: I believe in capitalism and democracy. I also recognize that there are times that both have failings. That doesn’t mean that we abandon either, but we do need to recognize that both need tweaking from time to time, and maybe more importantly, sometimes things get so out of control that you need to temporarily throw the book out.
This story surprised me. I have to admit it has a lot of plot twists and turns that I was not expecting. And I loved Allie. She’s fierce and feisty. She’s lead an incredibly risky life and managed to survive. She doesn’t take any shit from anyone and knows what she wants from life. She wants to free the humans from the enslavement of the Vampires.
In fact, according to a May 2009 study led by a vaccine research team at Kaiser Permanente Colorado’s Institute for Health Research which ran in the June 2009 issue of the journal “Pediatrics,” children who aren’t vaccinated are 23 times more likely to get whooping cough compared to fully immunized children.
The hotel was amazing; so cozy, warm and welcoming. It was the perfect place to relax and recharge for a weekend. Saturday we toured around Tofino (which is tiny, so it didn’t take long), and enjoyed a delicious lunch at a little place called SoBo. I also lucked out and found a cute little yarn shop to further fuel my yarn addiction (another post on that later)! After a fun walk along the beach (in the rain of course) and a few photos, we decided to call it a day and relax with a glass of wine before a lovely dinner.
our dads could build a house together (lol)
I've been wanting to do a Square Foot Garden for a long time. Today I finally did it!
“What happened?” he asked.
“Well heard he took over after his uncle died. It’s like a family business thing.”
After the kids went to bed, my mom and I headed out to the store. It's SO nice to be able to go to the store in the evenings without the kids. I'll miss that when we move. Anway, we went to the Dollar Tree (for poster board, graham crackers, and tissue wrapping paper) and Fred Meyer (cream cheese).
Put hashbrowns in 9X13 baking dish. Spread the browned sausage over the hashbrowns.
Much later, the Victorians resurrected this custom, as a part of Christmas celebrations. Author Washington Irving describes this tradition.
Unlike the quakes of 1811-1812 there were many more people living there today. The Chickisaw Indian tribe were the sole inhabitants of Memphis in 1812. 283 miles north of the Chickisaw was St Louis with only 1,200 people. Today their metropolitan areas have 1.3 and 2.8 million people. Most of the homes and businesses in the area were at least partially destroyed.
Everybody knows Cate Cahill and her sisters are eccentric. Too pretty, too reclusive, and far too educated for their own good. But the truth is even worse: they’re witches. And if their secret is discovered by the priests of the Brotherhood, it would mean an asylum, a prison ship – or an early grave.
And I pray that I'm not wrong,
I can’t say yet whether Hoofnhorn will ultimately fit in this paradigm. But the combination of innovative thinking to solve social problems, and the attention to programming over profits speaks to the integrity and values I am looking for. I am meeting with Jacen next week to discuss Hoofnhorn, and I am hoping to find some palatable advice.
Chris went back to Hank and tapped his elbow. Hank was looking at Truck’s registration and insurance card which he had retrieved from the glove compartment. “Yeah, that’s him,” Hank said to the sergeant.
Once all the paint was dry on the all the individual pieces, we were ready to move them out of our way so that we could start working on the desktops. We spent quite a bit of time brainstorming on how we wanted to do the tops. We originally wanted to take a couple boards and kreg jig them together but after Aaron came home with some Red Oak Purebond (for the sides which still had to be done but aren't too interesting), I realized that the grain of it would be nice for a stained desktop. So the plans changed again. Even after all that talking/planning/measuring we did.
under people’s asses. That’s how I get things done. and then I usually have to fan the damn thing until people actually get up and do what I need done. I tell ya, it’s a lot of work lighting those fires.
I think we can all agree the best part of awards shows is the fashion! And the red carpet is where all the magic is revealed. No show is bigger than the Oscars, where everyone brings out the big guns...the most fabulous dresses, hair and makeup!
I’m working on spending more carefully. Which is good for me. It is discouraging, though, to think that it won’t actually have any effect on our ultimate financial situation. He’ll find a way to spend whatever I manage to save. But in trying to improve my personal spending/saving skills, it will help me in the future, if/when I get to be on my own.
Throughout scripture, it tells us how much God loves us, chose us, adopted us, cares for us … but today, I share this powerful scripture. I pray you are encouraged to know deep within you how precious you are in the eyes of God ~ how much HE loves and cares for YOU!
Now bright, the sun breaks o’er my head
The more they try to deny God’s existence the more self determined in their selves they become. The more prideful and arrogant in their ways. The more they try to deny that God is alive and real- the more angry they become. The more hateful and hostile they become against anything that has anything to do with the thought or even idea that there is a God. The more they try to convince their selves that this innate thing inside of them that tells them that there is something more than this world- that there is something more to their own physical body than just what you see and feel and can touch- the harder their heart becomes.
We pondered over these words, unable to come up with any reply other than "wow."
So you’re probably wondering what I did during April, since I bowed out of the biggest blogger event short of NaNoWriMo. I read some books I had no obligation to write a review on, cleaned out my archived e-mails, deleted a lot of unnecessary files from three stored locations, and took a blogger break to write on some of my unfinished projects; except I didn’t write anything worth mentioning. The project I started to revise had a very serious glitch that I didn't notice until I tried to write the query letter; it lacks a plot.
Ms. Diaz is charged with two counts of animal cruelty, which is a disorderly person’s offense. She could face up to a $1,000 fine, up to 30 days in jail or community service, if she is found guilty.
First, I want to let my mom know not to cry, there is no reason to cry, everybody dies. Everybody has their time, don’t worry about me. I’m strong. To my family: my old man, my kids, daddy is sorry. I love each and every one of you. I’ll be looking for you. To my wife, I love you. The last two years have been the best. All my kids, mom, nieces, and nephews, I am proud of all of ya’ll. I love each and every one of ya’ll. I really love ya’ll.
If you are just returning after a (too long! I've missed you!) absence from this page, then you probably don't know I am moving to Oregon. So let me fill you in. I am moving to Oregon.
Enjoy, and GOOD LUCK!
To get right to the punch, we haven't been doing great with our spending "fast" lately. Some unexpected expenditures have seemed to pop up this month that we didn't work into our plan (gifts, baby shower, wedding, etc).
6. Anxiety is pointless.
"They never verified anything, even when I asked them to," Smith said. "I was told, 'Everyone says it's not them.'"
Goat Cheese Amulets.
I love watching cooking programmes.
The Be SMART Home Program offers two types of loans: Be SMART Home ENERGY STAR and Be SMART Home Complete. Through both types of financing, home owners are able to choose their weatherization and energy efficiency professionals from a list of eligible providers whose qualifications have been reviewed by DHCD.
~ Mahatma Gandhi ~
Muse: How do you get to Fiåney?
Total Recall (Rob Bottin, Alfred Sousa)
After a peaceful hiatus at home in Rockabill, Jane True thinks that her worst problem is that she still throws like a girl - at least while throwing fireballs. Her peace of mind ends, however, when Anyan arrives one night with terrible news... news that will rock Jane's world to its very core. After demanding to help investigate a series of gruesome attacks on females - supernatural, halfling and human - Jane quickly finds herself forced to confront her darkest nightmares as well as her deepest desires. And she's not sure which she finds more frightening.
Let me walk with my brother
There is a profound mystical attraction to the sea that comforts the lamenting soul.
I'm doing well at the moment, and have two books 'on the go'... The first is 'Awkward Situations For Men' by Danny Wallace. A great collection of tales of varying woe and embarrassment from Danny's life to date, like...
The lenses,
Origin of Gangs
He promised me my dreams the way I see.
- Drop images from your photo library to write over or around
It really is amazing to see these fertility goddesses side by side. They all have the same symbolism; just from different times and different places. Most all have a serpent of some kind. We all know what that represents. Here is an interesting take from a secular point of view---
We’re fully sick of your unfair share
Two other problems made this memoir a terrible read for me: a flashy vocabulary and what I perceived to be a lack of an actual story. The author used long, multisyllabic, sometimes scientific terms. I had no idea what some of them meant–which isn’t always a problem–but because I wasn’t involved in the story, I did not feel inclined to look them up. The author didn’t seem to have a reaction to any of the events and observations they described, so I could not connect emotionally.
Really Reasonable Ribbon Ivory Seam Binding (1 yd)
About a year ago, I wrote this post. The irony, I know. So today, Mother's Day, I find myself thinking about Stacey waking up without a mother and Amy waking up without a daughter, and my heart is heavy for them.
Schmidt began to answer.
Rachel Sutton-Spence
Known as The Waldorf of Harlem, Hotel Theresa was Malcolm’s favorite hotel – so much so that it was the site of Malcolm’s headquarters for his Muslim Mosque, Inc. and Organization of African American Unity, once he split with Nation Of Islam. It’s also the hotel where Malcolm facilitated accomodations for Fidel Castro and his entourage when, in September 1960, they came to New York City to attend The United Nations General Assembly.
Well they don’t. People kill people. But sometimes they use a gun to do it. Oil isn’t ethical or unethical (unless you add corn … get it? ethyl alcohol? Sorry, corny I know, but I couldn’t resist. And it does raise another, ethical problem with our oil addiction: growing crops for gasoline additives.).
Today is our 3rd official Fiskars Friday! Make sure to enter because as you already know, FISKARS has incredible cutting tools and they might just end up in your craft room! This contest is bi-monthly so look for our FISKARS FRIDAY banner and make sure to enter following our simple rules below.
I just realized that I’ve been uploading my stuff to the media section without actually creating a post for you guys to read. (They were each uploaded before their due date, I just didn’t know nobody could see them without really working for it)
b. Ultimate Pet Resort License is attached 32
The increased public consciousness presents a huge opportunity for an organization like Grameen Foundation, and I’ve learned that we’re tapping into it through initiatives like Bankers Without Borders®, a volunteer program that draws on the expertise of experienced professionals who are looking to streamline processes at social enterprises on the ground. The program has grown rapidly since it began in 2009, with more and more volunteers every year embarking on eye-opening (and, importantly, impact-generating) projects.
i knitted two stripes from the true hemp crafters cord and place them around the pictures. i secured them with brads. then i inked only the “i believe in you” phrase from HC my guy set with colorbox pigment inkpad “midnight”. i stamped the sentiment carefully on the background paper. i punched a star shape, added a brad and placed it next to the big picture.
Bank of America will begin charging a $5 monthly fee for the use of their debit card to make purchases. Other banks will follow so they are not
As ALWAYS, I hope this post finds your 'junking cup' running over....hahahahaha....At the very LEAST....I hope you're having a SWELL weekend....!
Eiffel Tower – This is one of the world’s most recognizable monuments (and the best-known monument in all of Europe), and it is breathtaking to behold. Be sure to take the lift to the top for a spectacular view of the city. This attraction alone drew 6.2 million visitors in 2002, according to Paris Office of Tourism statistics.
"Please, professor, do." We made ourselves as comfortable as possible on piles of old DEC manuals. Mine had a scrap of paper on top which bore only the words "BELL END". I held it up. "Professor? Is this important?"
Now, if I look beyond just crochet and knitting, I am much more of a balanced crafter. When you balance knitting and crochet against spinning and weaving, I am still a knitter first and foremost, I’m a brand new but dedicated weaver and an intermittent spinner. Because I can take my knitting anywhere it is my go-to activity, but spinning calms me in a way that nothing else does and weaving is still quite challenging although it has a nice balance of rhythm and interest that I think could become a popular part of my fiber repertoire.
- Why does this 102-year-old Bronx parking valet look like 80? How come his sisters (aged 93 and 98) still go bowling? NY Post
Apr 7
This red maple in our front yard started out around three feet tall nine years ago and here it is today.
Me: It's a tall drink of water.
A few quotes from the novel:
I've always loved cupcakes & i've always loved sprinkles. yet i've only just begun to love them both in a pretty tea cup xoxo
It would be in violation of the United Nations charter and illegal under international law.
I knew there was no way over it,
What's your schedule looking like this season?
Which brings me back to the question in the first para of this posting – Which media agency did not publish grainy black and white screenshots of a sex video in recent weeks?
- 1/2 cup nutritional yeast (optional)
So, why are habits so difficult to beat?
Fireworks: Launch Yellow Fireworks
Bloomberg, a militant reformed smoker, said that if the plot had been successful, "it could've theoretically lit up to 100 or more cigarettes or 50 cigars."
On this particular day, however, I had forgotten he had those shoes on. He had done ok for a while, taking time to stop and put them back on when they fell off, or picking himself up again from another minor trip. Finally, there was one bigger fall that caused some scraping, though he still caught himself. He looked at me with tears in his little eyes that said, "I'm frustrated and hurt." It was then I had one of those mom moments. You know. The ones when you hear yourself saying something to your children and suddenly realize you're talking to yourself too. Ever had one of those?
The texture of the dough is great, easily shape and with this dough I got about 45 cookies. It's all depend on the size you've made.
I will still read about you, because you are still cool.
We went to another church, where there was a window depicting a saint whose name I've forgotten, but who was rather petulantly showing us a graze on his knee. Marina recognised him, apparently he was rather badly wounded but his dog licked his injuries which miraculously healed at once. Presumably, the sore knee was the final hurt that the dog hadn't licked yet, but the flirty yet indignant display of knee was highly entertaining.
I kept the card simple and used use a stamp from my one & only 'Stampin' Up' set. I added some 'doodles' to the cup cake case and faux stitching around the edge of the card.
Imbued with style and fun, the Mini Megaphone Amplifier is an ideal promotional product for all ages. Use it around the home, in the office, on the field, poolside, or anywhere else you would want a bigger burst of sound.
There are various reasons for this difference: religious faith in the Third World tends to play a larger role in public life and the construction of personal identity than in the secular First World (with the obvious exception of aspects of US society). Another perhaps stronger reason is development; technological progress and economic prosperity has made scientific rationalism the official ideology of the First World whereas other cultures take a more nuanced, holistic view of reality. As Salman Rushdie writes in Midnight’s Children, “Reality has metaphorical content; that only makes it more real.”
In contrast to the terrors which will sometimes assail those inclined towards obedience and love of virtue He has set the gain of their love towards Him, in order that by the consolations ensuing from this, and by their aiming at what is greater, that which is burdensome may disappear and that which sometimes seems to cause pain sink into insignificance. Sweet is their labour to those who love God, since indeed theirs is a near and rich reward. Who then could conceive any thing greater, and what will he say is more glorious, than to be and be called the friend of Christ? For see how the reward surpasses the very limits of the nature of man. For all things are subject unto Him that made them, according to the saying of the Psalmist; and there is, I suppose, nothing in Creation which has not been subjected to the yoke of slavery, in accordance with the |404 decree becoming the Creator and His work. For the work produced is not on an equality with its producer; and how could it be’? But God, Who is over all, will hold sway over and direct His own works. The universe then being under the yoke of subjection, and putting itself under servitude to God, the Lord leads up His holy ones to a supernatural glory, if they appear willing to work His Will and bring to Him, as an offering that is due, a blameless subjection. Their reward then is glorious and worthy of envy.
1) Subscribe to my blog.
In contemporary usage, the term ironic can now be freely used to refer to things or situations that are purely coincidental. In this blog entry, please allow me to use the term ‘ironic’ in contemporary English to say what I have to say because I believe God knows exactly what I mean and that’s what matters more to me. Just please note that when I say ‘ironic’ I meant ‘cosmic-ly ironic’ (just so I wouldn’t have to deal with malapropism like Alanis did back in the 90’s LOL.)
Here are some lovely pictures of the work
Lucky Lost. Originally called When Lucky Lost. Some people think that Lucky is actually me. There might be a grain of truth in this, but suffice to say that the song was actually written about how Lord Lucan mistakenly killed his children's nanny and was rumored (according to the newspaper article I was reading about it) to have been killed by the same people that were helping him to absconded. This was supposedly to prevent the Lucan family and the peerage from any further embarrassment and shame. It was one of the very first songs that I wrote and I am immensely proud of it. Again it was another song that was first recorded by Keith Spouncer, but I could sense that he had not done the song justice and I was planning on asking him to re record his vocals but he beat me to it and left the band for a second and final time. I probably had the hardest job, but the most fun, with this song. It took me a full four hour session to find my vocal 'motivation' because I couldn't sing the song in the register that Keith had first sung it. So after many a failed attempt I finally realised that I needed to put myself into character and become the actual killer of Lucan and not the narrator. I then asked Ian to give me a heavier drum sound and to bring Ad's great bass playing right up in the mix, I then recorded all the backing vocals which are meant to be the ethereal voices of the victims of the narrator as well as Lucan's victim, and thus the song started to come to life. Then I started getting carried away. Keys were added, thunder, lightening, screams - from a Hollywood movie sound archive - and what Sam refers to as the 'toy piano' in the intro and outro. Oh well. You can't please everybody all of the time eh? Personally speaking, I love everything about this song. Job done.
My mother, as she measured the hem line on me, knew immediately that I didn’t like it. I also knew I would have to wear it anyway. That didn’t stop me protesting, though. My disappointment came flooding out in a litany of grievances:
I managed to get most of Suppression's releases over the years and the majority of it is spectacular. It's like if Man Is The Bastard kept the noise parts, but instead of wandering off into the more technical instrumental parts, they opted for the blunt ferocity of Crossed Out or No Comment. Even after power violence turned into a higher-profile subgenre in recent years, with hordes of shitty youth crew bands throwing in a few blast beats and thinking that turns them into the next Infest, Suppression's music remains as bracing and compelling as when it was released.
I have a little over seven months to complete the rest of my list.
His word my hope secures.
(Gioacchino Rossini; arr. William Hanna / Joseph Barbera)
3. Calling All Destroyers- Although this song was made when T.Rex were becoming less popular, it’s one of my all time favourites. It’s fast and loose and feels like you’re on a psychedelic roller-coaster.
infected Nigerians.
Allow your being to reach out and join with all others to bring this about. Envelope your dear planet in the brilliant light and love that is expanding from the many, many of you who are now waking and intending these changes. Perhaps intend that they occur with love and ease, smoothly, with harm to no one. Intend the same for all creatures who ride this beautiful blue spaceship with you. All are being uplifted with you. The effects of your efforts thus far have been amazing. We applaud you with all our hearts. But, as you say often, “You ain’t seen nothin’ yet.” As the incoming energy increases in purity and volume, the effectiveness of your awakened ones increases also. The rapidity of humanity’s awakening increases. Each person who progresses brings the conscious change to that many more. For those who understand the image, you are about ninety-seven monkeys along the path, maybe ninety-eight.
tried he couldn't find nothin but messy stuffs. So
(photos by very talented Nicole Koch)
Until next time xxxxxxxx
119
I'm normally not a fan of spiders but I'd never seen anything like her.
I had some dough left over so I wove it in a plaid shape (like the traditional challah bread) and topped it off with some cumin, red pepper flakes and ocean salt to make this delicious “Jeera bread”! I am thinking of eating it with a caesar salad tomorrow evening! Yummy!
That it also happened to five years to the day that the Showgirl and I had met, also at the Australian Embassy at a function for the Ambassador, only made it all the more special.
Lastly, I also take strolls and leisure walks. If you move for me, I will definitely move for you. In the meantime, I’ll use my cat-like reflexes to dodge your walking manoeuvres so as not to inconvenience you.
I’ve only had her for a month but I’ve already dealt with poop on the flood, puke on the bed and pee on the driver’s seat. Oh yea, that was pretty awesome. And toilet paper obsession is very obvious with her. One day she somehow pulled a whodini and escaped from her crate. I got home to poo on the floor; all my papers were off the paper because she had shoved them off while exploring for food, all my blankets were pulled off my bed, even the sheets, and she had toilet paper all over the place and most of it was chewed to shreds. But she just looked up at me with those big brown eyes and all I could think of was, your so damn cute. I’ll discipline you later and proceeded to give her lots of hugs and kisses. My kids are probably going to be terrible!
There was a hand-made card taped to the top of the box.
Much more going on, no doubt ~ but my stove is calling for my attention...Black Bean Soup in process.
My birthday began with the water-
However, to make sure that every family who participates in a fundraiser benefits, I will guarantee you at least $10 toward your adoption, even if not a single person shops your fundraiser. Yes, that is a donation on our part, but we want to support those who are adopting, even as we are supported. We are not Bystanders. We believe in blessing others, and believing that God will ultimately provide for all. So many people I read about in blogs are looking for ways to earn money. And every dollar counts! If you're one of those people that needs every dollar, we want to help.
Art and dancing.
So wake up it is a brand new day, don’t just lay there. Get up and give my God some praise, for He is worthy each and everyday. Get up and began to pray. For you not know what the day will bring your way. But if you followed my recipe for joy above, my God will take good care of you with a whole lot of love and a little bit of grace. It is then you will be ready to run the race of today.
Preheat the oven to 425ºf. Bake until the biscuits are lightly browned, about 15 to 20 minutes. Brush the tops with the melted butter and serve hot.
In a quiet corner with no signs in the Porsche museum in Zuffenhausen, Germany, are a number of fireproof vaults and a huge library. This is Porsche’s DNA.
For the first time ever I don't panic. He'd mentioned they were so busy at work. He probably was working late.
Now then back to the Challenge Winners for April - as usual decisions were sooo difficult to make and I have picked out six winners this time, and could have added several more to the list. However these are the choices this time around - just irresistible:
Peace with God
- The therapist provides the safe container in which the client moves into and out of her/his inner process safely.
But I was late for class. I walked on. Honesty, I decided, wouldn’t help. He has to see that perspective for himself, and I didn’t have time to wait around for the kind arrival of a teachable moment.
"Meet me outside Theatre 2, tonight. 11pm..."
4 thick slices honey-baked ham, cut into 1/2-inch pieces
let’s get down to business and start to read
Some of you might not be up on the list of young women I lusted for during my high school days. Betsy Hagar was at the very top of that list. She is the one about whom I would write long, involved, erotic stories and then, being that I was so turned on by my own lustful creativity, I'd crank one out while still fantasizing about Betsy. Upon climax I would breathlessly begin to feel crushing guilt over my carnal tendencies and I'd take the paper on which I wrote the story and I'd burn it, supposedly (in my sick mind) as a way of burning the lust out of my mind for Betsy and all the other women on the list.
But being a Grand Slam Champion in and of itself carries no real value. To be frank, Chris Jericho is the only Grand Slam Champion who might be considered the Supreme Grand Slam Champion because he’s held every title necessary and applicable.
We are moving ourselves to Florida, and it is going to take a few trips back and forth. I will be away from the computer during the next few weeks, and may stay in Florida while the hubs makes a solo trip.
The collective
Celibidache famously eschewed recordings in general,
Sorry, just pulled a Tevye, from Fiddler on the Roof (sidenote: sorry Forlornslag, but I still haven’t gotten my copy back so I can’t lend this to you).
"The dog is screaming and he drags me across the street and it's a good thing I was holding the chain or I would have been staying there dead," he said.
You have one hour, pig, prepare yourself accordingly.
For those of you who have a hard time imagining...here are some (extremely flattering) examples.
I do feel proud when people ask me for blogging tips because it makes me assume I'm doing something right. I've given several tips on this blog, all from my own experience and research, i.e., discovering what works for me. Another phrase I hear often is "blogging etiquette". There is such a thing but it's definition is "common sense". If I read and enjoy a post I'll leave a comment. If I read and disagree with a post, then again I'll leave a comment - maybe not what the author wants to read but still, a debate is healthy interaction in the blogosphere. If I read but dislike a post, then I tend not to comment because I think there's nothing worse than leaving negative comments just for the sake of being awkward or unnecessarily pedantic. But something that should always be welcomed in the comments section of a blog post is an opinion.
“No one is disputing that prosecutors have tremendous responsibility, and the vast majority do a good job under difficult circumstances. But now that the Supreme Court has given prosecutors almost complete immunity for their actions, we need to develop systems of accountability for dealing with those prosecutors who violate their ethical obligations,” said Jennifer Laurin, Assistant Professor, University of Texas School of Law.
Have a fabulous evening, folks! You have been warned. Doom doom doom….
Place the dough, cut side down on to a greased baking pan and leave aside to rise for another hour or so.
I have a number of mental health issues – bi-polar being just one. But even just my bi-polar is of a severe nature with long cycles and unlike anyone else I know. Add to that my creative writing style of thoughts and how much different am I already then the bi-polar you know? Add to that my anti-social disorder and now we are talking about a whole different league.
It's very special to me for a couple of reasons. First, I happen to be lucky enough to have one of my stories published in it by the name of Candlewick. I hope you enjoy it. Also, The Scribe of Rashid by Sharon Cathcart, one of my cyber buddies is published in it, as well. The second reason, even more important than the first, is that it's a work of hope for cancer patients across the world. All of the proceeds go to the American Cancer Society.
When our guest from Sydney visited us last week, they have made a special request that they can't tolerate spicy food. In this case, I had chosen penne arabiata to grace our dining table.
2. I had a book release party for book one in my trilogy, “Year of the Chick”!!!
It's a poem about a little girl who tells lies and ends up being ignored when she needs help the most.
from 1967...
Finely chop onion and add to large zipper bag. Chop chicken into bite size pieces and add to zipper bag.
The matron and crone are much more complicated. In fairy tales there is normally a dead (thus absent) mother and/or an evil stepmother. The crone can be either a wise woman or an evil witch. Older women are either passive or evil. The narratives haven’t really changed.
*Pinched nerve.
The seated figure of William Shakespeare is flanked by life-size statues of Lady Macbeth, Prince Hal, Hamlet, Henry V, and Falstaff, representing Philosophy, Tragedy, History, & Comedy. The memorial was sponsored by Lord Ronald Sutherland -Gower, who presented it to the town of Stratford in 1888.
Near the beginning of this month, my sister and I went to a small NBTSC gathering in New York state. A friend swung a few hours out of her way to pick me and my sister up, and we had a nice little roadtrip through the mountains to a small and really lovely town. There we stayed, with a handful of other people, at the house of the friends who were hosting us. And what a lovely house it is! Which for me, someone who absolutely ADORES old buildings, was quite a big plus. (I didn't take many pictures, so I'm afraid the few I have aren't so hot)
Tom turned one of the pallets on it's end, disassembled another pallet and used it's remains to put bottoms on the rows so that they would hold dirt and Voila! we have vertical gardening! This is our little Daisy garden. The daisy's are sharing space with strawberries, some herbs, and some nasturtiums. It might not be a place Daisy would have spent time or even have known it existed. But it will do Tom and I some good.
Other issues that people face when dealing with Rachel is her evident phoniness, and hollow, empty emotions, frequent and intense angry outbursts. A seemingly amiable woman, Rachel turns angry quickly when faced with opposition or things do not go her own way. If she is asked to do something by an employer, Rachel will find any excuse not to do it, if she does not feel like doing what is required. The excuses are extensive and they are fictitious. Rachel will delegate duties to others, in order that she will not have to perform them herself.
We enjoy the partnership aspect. We have each other when things are great and going well, and have each other when they go wrong. It's also really helpful to have another person you really trust to give a second opinion. And frankly, we just enjoy hanging out with each other. We are lucky that way.
James also stepped into the role of a punt returner this last season at Oregon. This is where I see him having the best chance of getting some playing time. You may think, “Don’t the 49ers have Ted Ginn Jr.?” Yes, but he is not the most durable player on the team. In fact, I would have to label him as the complete opposite; Ginn is very undependable. It’s not a case of whether Ginn gets hurt; it is a matter of when. Once it happens, James better be ready to step into that role. I highly doubt they will let Kyle Williams back there after his two botched returns in the NFC Championship game.
45. Thee Headcoats - Fingers In The Sun
striped with long, lean shadows of one of my greatest fascinations.
This is a very good friend of mine who is suffering the devastating effects inflicted by Mary Cowbag-Thing and her kind. Unfortunately, my friend looks like this all the time. We cannot tell which way round she is any more. It's tragic. This all came about from the sheer strain of having to organize the tasks around Mary Cowbag-Thing. Communication is when this horrific kind of symptom is inflicted, and there is no known cure.
and let’s pull together and fall beneath
And sudden blue light,
The trip this time around was planned as a day trip. In order to endure such a hard schedule, they each chugged an Okinawan local specialty health drink called “Habu (‘Pit Viper’) Attack”. A fishy smell filled the bus…
That certainly seems the case with Brynmawr, another series of terrace strips which once abutted the famous Rubber Factory, surely for a time Wales' most famous 20th century building; a failed attempt at co-operative industry, at doing things differently, eventually demolished in 2001 in defiance of listing. By the end, it was a Semtex factory. After a few hours in the traumatic townscape of Ebbw Vale, you could easily imagine terrorist cells emerging, avenging the damage done to the town and its people. The anti-tank measures and frisking at Cardiff's Senedd suddenly make sense. Follow the sign to the DHSS, and you can find some of the saddest sights in Britain. Worn, never-changed signs to the Civic Centre lead to a decent, if undemonstrative 1960s complex, its office blocks surrounded by the churned-up paving of a car park. A distressed leisure centre has a growth on it, the bright yellow and green tentacles of swimming pool flumes, with broken glass underneath. An angular underpass from here brings you to the rest of the town, and it has the most eloquent graffiti I've ever seen. 'AMAZING VALUE £5 – A WORKING CLASS HERO'. Then there's a small recreational ground, and the start of the terraces. The street lights are on. It's three o'clock in the afternoon, in July.
Hail, hail to the newborn King
I like how you smell
He ruled out a political career but showed some of his father’s charisma and contradictions in answering students’ questions, according to the newspaper. Asked about the pictures of him partying at Oxford, he quoted Chairman Mao as saying “you should have a serious side and a lively side,” and went on to discuss what it meant to be one of China’s new nobility.
The good mate said: “Now must we pray,
Eric Holder, the US Attorney General, has said that Justice Department lawyers are examining how Mr Assange could be indicted over the leak of the diplomatic cables. “This is not just sabre-rattling on our part,” he said. “We are talking about one of the most serious violations of the Espionage Act in our history. To the extent that we can find anybody who was involved in the breaking of American law… they will be held responsible; they will be held accountable.”
A group of six Asian men - including two sets of brothers - have been charged by police in connection with allegedly running the sex trafficking ring in the university city known for its dreaming spires.
There is no Victorian hospital at which a private midwife can attend her clients as a visiting midwife, despite the government-supported indemnity insurance plan that midwives have purchased at great expense. We understand that the Victorian Health Department has given funding to the 3 Centres group to sort out hospital visiting rights/clinical privileges for eligible midwives - a project that may report at the end of this year. Midwives who go to hospital with their clients are doing so without any professional recognition.
“If the modern state nationalizes certain industries, it does not do so for the purpose of restricting capitalist exploitation, but for the purpose of protecting the capitalist system and establishing it upon a firmer basis, or for the purpose of itself taking a hand in the exploitation of labour, increasing its own revenues, and thereby reducing the contributions for its own support which it would otherwise have to impose upon the capitalist class. As an exploiter of labour, the state is superior to any private capitalist. Besides the economic power of the capitalists, ii can also bring to bear upon the exploited classes the political power which it already wields.
In 6 weeks I will be moving 2000 miles away to a new home. If our house here doesn’t sell, I will be moving with our son while my husband stays here to finish selling the house. What does this mean? MEGA stress! It would be a stressful situation even if I didn’t have BPD. But I do. So, please keep me in your thoughts as the middle of June (and thereafter) approaches. I hope to be in a DBT program right after the move, but nothings been set up for sure yet. I know sadness will be a difficult emotion for me to deal with during the transition. My elderly parents will be here, not there. My husband will probably be here, not there. Friends? Well I really don’t have any so that’s not a problem. I do plan on REALLY trying to make friends when I move. I know I need more of a support system than I have here, and it will be up to me to develop it.
An offer that cannot be refused. Best value for your money whether you are in Chicago or Indianapolis TGIF has your back.
Let's direct our anger and attention to those things in the food system that are actually genuinely bad. Like the fact that it is so much cheaper to buy Easy Mac than real cheese. Or the whole HFCS/corn sugar thing. The thing is, if anti-"pink slime" crusaders are successful, the result will be hundreds or thousands of lost jobs, millions more cattle killed each year, and more low-income families eating Easy Mac instead of meals made of lean ground beef like tacos and spaghetti. Meanwhile, beef will become an out-of-reach meat for average families, like salmon or lamb, because of its high costs.
Welcome to Studio Saturday! Each week one of our contributors gives you a sneak peek into their studio, creative process or inspirations. We ask a related question of our readers and hope you'll leave comments! As an incentive we offer a free prize each week to bribe you to use that keyboard.
Rose shoots from last year, they really didn't seem to mind!
Why did you hit your sister?
R 5: Repeat R 3 and R 4 around. Twist each spoke after starching and let dry thoroughly.
But if the eclipse of the new progressive era has many causes, one stands out: the American Left has no coherent or compelling moral vision to justify its policy aims. It frequently can’t articulate why it is it believes what it does. Leftists are philosophically adrift. To a substantial degree, this is because American liberalism has become a haven for wonks. Many prominent leftists seem to believe that political debates are won and lost by econometric analysis. This undercuts their willingness (and their capacity) to justify their projects.
The suggestion here is the introduction of new line of business. It shall create micro; small and medium-sized businesses then sell it and train the new owners. It shall serve people who have capital and ambitions but lack the know-how. It shall also provide research and development services for existing or emerging businesses.
I had to add back 10l of water which I had reduced the hardness of, I didn't bother to add the salts as it was post mash. This was because I was worried about the evaporation and losing too much beer and it being too strong. After the extra addition I go to where I wanted to be.
Overall, I’m really enjoying the book and I get a sense that the story is going to really open up and get much bigger as time goes on. I’m sure you will all advise me to read the whole series. I’m ready for your impassioned feedback!
I think it might have exceeded our expectations — but only because they were *extremely* low. Still, it’s nice to not be let down. The movie was alright.
So far, negotiations with Iran and six nations, including the U.S., have produced nothing. Ben-David said the next round on May 23 is crucial.
Now think of the best-selling books. THAT is how books are like ice-cream.
My veins ran cold and against my better judgment, I picked this canvas up and turned it over to read the label. Under the heading of Medium, my father had scrawled: Acrylic and Blood.
One thing separates Malachey Elyon from other sorts of messengers. Those on ordinary errands in the world generally know that they are sent, know what they are sent to communicate, and by what agency. Malachey Elyon rarely even know that they are messengers. Attending, like others, to the business and pleasures and relations of their lives, they are all the while being sent somewhere else.
I don't know if it was the rain, or the hurricane, or what, but Casa Smallcomb has been crawling with critters lately. First, the other night, I opened the front door to let the dogs out, and a big toad jumped inside. Like he had wanted to ring the doorbell, but couldn't quite reach. I would have gotten a picture (he was big and fat!), but I was trying to keep 2 dogs and 3 cats from doing him harm.
We are now living in Strathmore, am a stay at home mom trying to make part time money from teaching piano and internet businesses. We've been married 5 years now, together a total of 6 1/2 years. Got drunk one evening and decided to act on a crush of a local stud.. The carpet cleaner! I don't know why I attempted again and again to contact that neighbour ( in vain). I don't believe I'm unhappy in my marriage, my marriage with Jon has been the most level relationship in my life!
Why this topic? Why now?
Too many of our current politicians are people who are too respectable and too moderate; people who are afraid to upset anyone; people who follow the crowd rather than challenge people to think about alternative routes.
The movie is a joke. It’s so over the top. Overt propaganda for British patriotism, and so idealizes the person of Elizabeth, aggrandizing her into a sort of superhero. So the acting is grossly exaggerated, and has no sense of realism.
At first there had been skirmishes as Marik’s tribes were warned from their settlements and wondering grounds to make way for irrigation and mining. Newcomers fenced enclosures for strange pets and created habitats so alien compared with the indigenous bush retreats. But after time, the invaders realised the innocuousness of the Tamins and allowed them to integrate. They even became useful when imparting their indigenous knowledge. Some were in the employ of settlers as domestic help or labourers. Others kept to themselves and maintained the old ways. Tamin superstitions were easily tolerated, as long as the humanoids could perform their experiments unhindered and choose supplicants among the natives
I gave each “improvement” one week to bed down before moving to the next. The first change wasn’t strictly related to learning a language; more of a parallel change. I decided to stop snacking after the kids’ bedtime.
So get voting!
Every neighborhood has one. That grouchy lady who keeps to herself and scares the children on the block. Nobody trick or treats at her house because she doesn’t leave her porch light on. Groups of kids just walk on by her house on Halloween and swap stories about the awful things they’ve seen her do. At Christmas time her house is the only one that’s not lit up with beautiful twinkling lights. It looks as cold as the snow covering her yard. Come summertime, she had better not catch you shooting off any fireworks or she’ll be calling the cops to end your fun. Every block in America has one of these old bags…. who would have ever thought that at 26, it’d be me?
THINK and SEE we are at the CRISIS stage being set up NOW! How many ideologues does it take to destroy a nation? Are the Occupy and Tea Party movements just part of a great campaign to destabilize and set us up for a violent crisis? WAKE-UP people!
With the mixer on medium speed, very slowly add the warm cream to the eggs. (If you add it too quickly or in one go, the warm cream could scramble the eggs.) Add the vanilla and rum and combine. Strain the custard through a fine-mesh sieve into a large measuring cup. Pour the custard into 4- or 6-ounce ramekins until almost full.
Prior to moving to the National Security Council, Restrepo was the director of the Americas Project at the Center for American Progress (CAP), the Soros funded liberal think tank, whose President and Chief Executive Officer is John Podesta…
So how do you make Mexican paste? Here are the instructions that Lorna gave us:
“That’s why these local council elections matter so much and in these local elections, we are campaigning on issues rooted in real lives, in everyday experience, everyday problems, such as jobs, the NHS, living standards and crime.
I guess it does kind of reflect my spirit, I never give up and dont like to take no for an answer. While I really liked the job I found the salary began to be an obstacle. Already salaries are way lower in France then in the U.S. but when you add the cost of living, especially with a child, and then add taxes to the mix I felt that I was left with nothing at all. Its true that during this time I have taken quite a few vacations (à la francaise)in anycase I just didnt feel like I could save the way a person working full time should be saving. So once again I went on the search for something with a more appropriate salary in the beginning I was searching for everything and anything. But as the search went on, I found more and more positions which I actually found interesting and weren't just "jobs".
Treat- Chocolate, Jelly Beans
In prep for my 11:00 meeting (which I knew would be l-o-n-g), I made yet another cup of chocolate tea. How pretty are the individual little bags?
Diinesh is an entrepreneur turned Sports, Nature and Wildlife Photographer. Photography was always pursued with a passion even as a student while studying in the United States of America for his Masters degree in Chemical Engineering. Diinesh has been regularly travelling across the wilds of India and Africa to realise and share his many dreams. The large amount of photographs and experience he has been able to gather convinced him to compile “DREAM SAFARI – A Pictorial Journey through Africa’s Cradle of Life”, a book based on his various trips to eastern Africa and its famed game parks.
And so we went to the graveyard. We were heading there all along, because Mister Rogers loves graveyards, and so as we took the long, straight road out of sad, fading Latrobe, you could still feel the speed in him, the hurry, as he mustered up a sad anticipation, and when we passed through the cemetery gates, he smiled as he said to Bill Isler, “The plot’s at the end of the yellow-brick road.” And so it was; the asphalt ended, and then we began bouncing over a road of old blond bricks, until even that road ended, and we were parked in front of the place where Mister Rogers is to be buried. He got out of the car, and, moving as quickly as he had moved to the door of his house, he stepped up a small hill to the door of a large gray mausoleum, a huge structure built for six, with a slightly peaked roof, and bronze doors, and angels living in the stained glass. He peeked in the window, and in the same voice he uses on television, that voice, at once so patient and so eager, he pointed out each crypt, saying, “There’s my father, and there’s my mother, and there, on the left, is my place, and right across will be Joanne. …. ” The window was of darkened glass, though, and so to see through it, we had to press our faces close against it, and where the glass had warped away from the frame of the door–where there was a finger-wide crack–Mister Rogers’s voice leaked into his grave, and came back to us as a soft, hollow echo.
I wish there was someone around here I could talk to that gets this. (Hope - if you're reading I don't mean to exclude you - pregnant people are hard to be around right now. I hope you understand, and I hope everything is going well for you). The friends I could call include 2 pregnant women, one of whom is unemployed (along with her husband) and purposely got pregnant with her third when the second isn't even two yet, a 37 year old virgin, a woman who couldn't be bothered to take the pill and has had several abortions, and my sister who has access to the best medical money can buy. You can see that I have trouble with resentment in pretty much all these cases. I realize I sound like a stuck up bitch but I know when something will cause more harm than good.
I said, “But why? Cause he’s white?”
Well, if you’ve ever been you know one of their appetizers that they are well-known for is their “Bang Bang Shrimp” – delicious fried shrimp in a yummy spicy sauce.
The two men fled the scene on bicycles.
Hex #6 Feb 1986
Andrew Sharpe of Charles Russel CRITique | Our Commercial Law blog :#TwitterJokeTrial: a Deconstruction of a Statutory Provision – a sharp observation on a difficult issue (mea culpa) and also uses twitter to engage and make useful comments on a range of topical issues.
Most lenses in the medium price range of watches are made from plexiglass, a type of synthetic plastic. Sprout® lenses are made from Mineral crystal which is a type of glass made from sand. It can technically be recycled.
These have been a BIG hit in this house. They were a lot of fun to make. The second picture is a closeup of Mary and baby Jesus. We have an angel, carolers and a snowman. We gave the snowman away last night. I need to make a few more for presents. They are really attached to these. Now I am not exactly sure where I saw this particular idea. It may have been on pinterest or it may have been one of the thousand crafty blogs I follow. Who knows. But, if you want to know how, here is what we did.
June 3-16, 2012 in Shanghai, China
So two outfits for the price of one this Visible Monday morning. You should pop over to the round-up Patti organizes where there is always sartorial inspiration to get our week going.
29 Nov – Saartjie Baartman Centre, Athlone
Anyway, thank heavens for techie friends who suggested I use the Frame Maker App which can combine several pictures into one thereby lessening the chances of me boring the living daylights out of you. Yey!
So that's where I am this week. How about you? What healthier choices did you make this week?
Curves Class Scallop Quilt
10. Dig 3:16
I never thought I'd laugh as often as I cried. But I did laugh. We all did.
That's a welcome evolution. A conversation this morning with a PR/Communications firm gave me pause for thought as I consider my more or less ten years in this area.
1/3 cup walnuts, chopped and toasted
Really not what you want to hear. The fact that it was actually my brother, that kind of makes a difference.
It's a 3 game series so that means it gets randomized 3 times.
Seriously – who’s in charge of protocol, PR, and spin control at KCSO? If it’s ultimately all up to the Sheriff himself, surely they also have some legal eagle on that payroll that says things like “Maybe you should wait ’til…” or “I would advise holding off on that until…” and whatnot. Or if not an attorney, I would guess that they probably have (as most such state and county and metro agencies do), some PR person for whom one of their primary roles in their job description is advising “yes, this is a good idea” and “uh, this is not a good idea”.
If all goes well I'll head into 2013 with a meal plan, a compost pile, and a shopping list! And some nice fresh wheatgrass, of course.
Please do! Just be sure to include this complete blurb with it:
It also entireness exclusive on the demarcation of exteroception generality wherein one has to disc the oftenness pattern directly to the bread group to aplish a suitable ending.
What is that next step? Look no further than what technologists refer to as SoMoClo (social, mobile, cloud, or the dreadful “mocial”). While enterprises may have been the first to push and adopt the cloud, consumers have done likewise with the rise of social computing. And everybody is mobile.
So now that we are coming from love, we will vote without fear, with awareness of the complete picture. Our choices and our lives will reflect this truth. We are centered, we are whole, we are open and available to our full self and our actions reflect this. And you know this is not a state of being we need to find, it’s a state of being we already are. We all are already whole and complete, we only need to un-identify from our egoic self and re-identify from our whole, spiritual truth of being a spirit, residing in a body for the experience.
Be sad and disappointed in oneself. But, also remember that most of my freshmen haven’t dropped out and that my seniors are more ready for college than they were a year ago.
Talking of siblings, I received some worrying news about my younger brother yesterday morning - he is in hospital in France and has a long recovery ahead of him. Please think positively for him. This quilt top has kept me busy and I`m very grateful for that.
Interestingly, the two biggest online retailers -- Amazon and Barnes & Noble -- have quite divergent policies regarding returns.
Time to get to work. I am glad that I listened to the bed this morning, not that I will every morning though. Most times I have it my way but a little pillow talk once in a while…its good.
I actually kind of liked that color, but it was really fading and oxidizing. Like my mother (who I am turning into), I love a pale yellow house. This color comes close, but once it was on the house, wasn't exactly what I had in mind. Oh well, by then we'd spent $200 on it and several hours of Pete's time. So we stuck with it and I can live with it.
bind to trust,
Last week I went to Boston for the wedding of one of my knitting friends there, and had a lovely few days visiting with friends, knitting, and eating wedding cupcakes.
1 can extra large black olives, drained
He wasn’t interested in the 8 percent of the people that were uninsured. He was concerned about the 100 percent of the people of the country. “Obama-care” takes over health care for the American people.
(psst! I may get fingerprinted tomorrow as a walk in for our I 800 A application! Someone I just heard about who went in early got their approval back a week later! Let's see what God has in store!)
The biggest complaint I’ve heard is that contract terms change after the sale. These issues have included: changes to price, term and product type. Some customers have told me that their price changed only 3 months into their contract while others didn’t know what they signed up for. The main reason for these issues is lack of communication. Unfortunately if you don’t get a good referral, you may not know what you’re getting into. The most important feature of a business/energy supplier relationship is the relationship. Too many companies are misled by salespeople who don’t know the energy market or how to recommend the most effective programs. In any given de-regulated area there are only a handful of reputable and worthwhile energy suppliers. Their pricing should all be close and they should recommend multiple programs for a customer to choose from. If an energy supplier approaches you with a price that is substantially lower than the market, they should be questioned thoroughly.
20 seconds of pushups
The real issue isn't that the drugs are used to bring them to a professional level. The issue is that drugs are used to take them to the NEXT level. To make them Elite. To take an athlete to the "superior", "untouchable" level in his or her craft. To take someone that was already among the best of the best and make them better - to create that final level of separation!
No more! Michelin has just sold the building to an insurance company for 110 million euros.
Andy was led out. Olivia was hoping she could get her cell soon so she could lie down in peace and collect her thoughts. She was cold, she felt naked and she was scared. About 20 minutes later another guard appeared at the door.
I then was wondering about the pending war and I felt that the pending war was a spiritual war – an assualt on the Christians. Those who have committed to serve God, those who has His mark will not be afraid. God is going to protect them. Don’t be afraid of what is about to happen. The christians will be safe, keep focus on Jesus and not on the situation. God has prepared His children for this time and we need to rest in the fact that we are protected by God. Well, these were the words that came to me and also what I felt He was saying.
Yeast can impart a huge amount of character and flavour to a beer, especially unfiltered homebrew, so much so that I am beginning to dislike filtered commercial beers as they are simply missing too much character.
a bowl of Edamame beans, with chopped chilies, coriander and a touch of soya sauce / olive oil dressing (this counts as vegetable intake for the day)
Oops. Sorry, that's not quite right, the more accurate translation is "thou shalt not suffer a poisoner to live."
Love is the only thing she has ever craved..
American energy policy has traditionally promoted cheap and abundant energy to sustain economic growth. An energy policy that relies on economic weakness is not in our national interest. We are focusing all of our effort on solutions that are small scale and high cost.
Happy long weekend to you all!
"If disaster struck, and there was no more peanut butter, I just don't think I could go on."
Related links to the stairway
An old Taoist parable goes like this: A carpenter said to his apprentice: “Do you know why this tree is so big and so old?” The apprentice said, “No . . Why?” The carpenter answered, “Because it is useless. If it had been useful it would have been cut down,sawed up and used for beds and tables and chairs. But because it is useless, it has been allowed to grow. That is why it so great and you can rest in its shadow.” I think about this parable as I sit and stare out the window at an old tree that has survived high winds and storms. That tree seems useless, but it provides branches where birds serenade us with their songs, and its presence helps this old man sit and stare. There are times when however much we would like to be busily engaged doing something, the condition of our bodies or our minds just will not permit us to do any of the things about which we feel we would like to be busy. I am still fairly busy in my slowed down life style, but there are days when all I can do is to just sit, and stare at my tree. What’s wrong with that? There is value in doing nothing. As the poet expressed it,”What is this life, if full of care, we have no time to stand and stare. No time to sit beneath a tree and stare as long as sheep and cows. Poor life this, if full of care, we have no time to stand and stare.”
It has been all too long since I wrote words to contribute to this page. I guess for one reason or another, I just haven’t found the inspiration to write, though I have viewed plenty of films. Well, after two red bulls, a protein bar and half a line of coke, I think I’ve found the inspiration. Bring it on.
Dear *Samantha Approaching 29,
from the orchard edge,
Here's a brief refresher on how the JAWS system works:
﻿﻿﻿﻿﻿Next came the talent time. I can remember learning my dance on a Tuesday and starting to practice it with what little time I had left before Saturday. I loved to make mom nervous when I was in dance when I was younger (I'd never practice but be just fine on stage later on). I decided to do a folk reading / tap dance as my talent because I really just didn't want to make a decision which one I liked better. I have been beseda (polka) dancing since I was little but could not figure out how to do a polka dance on my own since this is mainly a partner type of dance style. I've also been a dancer since I was little so that part I knew would be easy to do.
Surprisingly, Community TV is not a new idea. Swindon Viewpoint describe themselves as a “focal point for the visual life and times” of the Swindon area. Beginning in 1958, they have transformed into an online living, breathing and growing documentary about all aspects of their local history (and present!). It is an endlessly explorable vault of diverse, well-created programmes. Despite all this, Swindon is not on any list of potential locations in plans for rolling out new local stations. Dubbed “the original YouTube”, we spoke to Chairman Martin Parry about what community media like this can really achieve.
But that is a story for another day ;)
Celebrating the arrival of Buffy seasons 5 and 6! Yeah me. Getting ready for my 20th class reunion in two weeks.
It can be tricky. First of all you have to remember that dialogue is there for a reason. It's meant to move the story forward. It's not a place filler.
By loving I am not condoning behaviors that I may disagree with. But I am accepting you as a person. And I hope that you would do the same for me.
At every child’s bedtime.
“Yes, Leah. Thank you,” I said.
using a red biro pen which again, is always in my basic tool set. The brides veil and tiara,
I used my old magazines to find inspiring words and phrases (Which, by the way...you would think magazines dedicated to making women feel beautiful and unique and confident in themselves would have a few words I couldn't find like: Remedy, Direction and Confidently...BUT alas, I couldn't find them...)
Quest Giver: Letter in mailbox.
This layout is one that Yara submitted for her DT application back in January. We had given a sketch to follow to see what the applicants could come up with and I just LOVED this take on the sketch and wanted to share this project of Yara's with all of you.
4. Brad Pitt or George Clooney?
Forgive the body.
Today, Obama cast Republicans’ hands-off approach as harmful to middle class families, who he says deserve government help.
In one sense, Eagleman seats consciousness in the brain, while Tallis seats the brain in consciousness. It’s more than a semantic difference — especially if the truly radical ideas of Robert Lanza are correct.
Now, do you still wonder why some professionals accomplish definitely much more than their colleagues on a daily basis? Why there are those people who deliver plenty better results almost everyday and not just when a special task is assigned to them or they are chasing a deadline that has to be met? Why your workmates that you either started with at the same time or got hired before got promoted way ahead of you?
Level 11: MP Cost: 10, Damage: 295%, Attacks up to 5 enemies.
Matthew 24:21
Also worth a mention:
The HHS mandate should have given all of us some things to ponder. I think these days we often want to always see the best in everyone, to assume that no one really wants to bring harm to others. We think that deep down everyone is good at heart, tries to keep their word, are basically working toward the same thing that we are.
The hospital used another 10,000 condoms to make a banner, reading "Combating AIDS, Implementing Commitments", for the event.
I've had this image from S2G for a long time, wanting to use it on something for my hubby, but hadn't gotten around to it. Our challenge this week gave me the perfect opportunity to make a Father's Day card for my DD and grandbabies to give to hubby. Father's Day here in Australia is the first Sunday in September...I'm being SOOOO organised lately lol...wonder how long it's going to last??!!
Against my sandy shallows.
That’s all you need to know right? Wind farms cause climate change. And so a myth is born.
How the trill of sing-song rhymes,
Anyway, there I was in my long velvet black skirt, an off-white puffy blouse complete with big shoulders and lace; this was, after all, the 80's. I remember sitting in a bedroom with another woman (I can't remember who it was) passing a bottle of Jack Daniels back and forth and declaring our mutual admiration for one another. This was Vermont after all: Get drunk and love.
I found the green metal container at a city wide garage sale out in the country a few months ago. I am not sure what it is called, but it looks like 2 ceiling tiles put together back to back with an opening at the top to add flowers or whatever you wish. It has a large white metal handle used for hanging. It was still new in the package and I payed $2.50 for it. I picked up a few picks here and there, knowing I would probably use them for the Holidays, and some of them I already had.
It’s a guess that the image was shot in Miami after the Cash Money singer flew out there earlier this year in January to start shooting the vide for the track.
Activities:
Or I could indulge my overactive, sleep-deprived brain.
Mind: No, you just had potato chips, and you have dinner waiting for you when you get home. You don't need any french fries.
I also think all the time we've been spending outside in this gorgeous weather has probably helped him be a bit more tuckered out as well.
What irks me the most about the Carrie/Mr. Big dynamic is that the message SATC sends women everywhere is that after years and years of Carrie dealing with Mr. Big’s crappy behavior, he finally changed. He finally became the man she wanted and needed. See, persistence pays off. Waiting for a crappy guy to finally get on his white horse pays off. Accepting sub par treatment from a man pays off in the long run.
Much as the previous section dealt primarily with hospitality, here too we have a focus, but a drier and less universal one, namely: contract law and contractual practices.
I’m not afraid to love someone if they have AIDS,
Chef Mark “ZIG” Zeigler’s culinary experiences began in high school by preparing his families meals with assistance from his Mom over the phone as she owned and operated a pharmacy. These lessons became a passion as he pursued multiple restaurant positions while working his way through FAMU. These experiences culminated in the opening and operation of Wing-A-Licious restaurant in Tallahassee, FL. After 12 years in residential and commercial banking and finance his passion for culinary arts called him back to the industry. He enrolled in school at The International Art Institute of Atlanta to pursue a degree in Culinary Arts. In 2010 he established Z Sauce Works, LLC which specializes in gourmet prepared meals for busy families, full service catering for any occasion and healthy school lunch programs. He has participated in local culinary challenges and been awarded first place at “Real Men Cook”, “Gourmet Gents” and “Celebrity Chef” challenges for various signature dishes. Chef Zig takes pride in providing “Divine Dining for Divine Diners”!
Size: 5-1/2 x 5-1/2.
Motivated, good attitude? check.
I’m getting fairly close to the end. My main character- a supernatural doctor with three murders on his shoulders- has just, after years of trying to understand the problems in his life, met The Enemy, and is in the process of being duped by him. This will set the whole rest of the novel in motion, and this might very well go quickly. Things are about to get intense for my doctor.
It's the most, wonderful time of the year....
My card base is white card stock cut and folded to 4 1/4” X 5 1/2”. I added a bright blue mat cut at 4” X 5 1/4” and then my patterned paper cut at 3 3/4” X 5”. I used some Doodlebug twine and wrapped it around my card.
I'm getting a lot of interest in this blog challenge for the month of April and I want to take as much time as I can to make sure we get it off the ground properly and that everyone gets proper credit. In the sidebar I have a list of participants so far. If you have agreed to blog along with us and your link is not there, let me know so I can get it up there. If you still want to join up in the challenge then let me know and I'll get your link on the roll. So far I only have one blogger who has committed to be a supporter by following participants and commenting on our posts. There have been several who said they are going to follow, but give me the commitment that you wish to be recognized as an official supporter so I can get your link posted to the list.
to ranks that would put her in line to inherit a seat in the sacred Secretariat
permanently.
Watch the shadows dissipate in the light of my love
Spoon the rice into the eye mask. You don't want it too full...it should be able to drape a bit. (You could add some lavender in there too, but my mom prefers unscented...it's better for her migraines.)
12. V They chattered like swallows
The list could go on and on but I’m obligated to stop since it may reflect badly on my otherwise decent composed self… When I watch soccer it’s another level of myself even I don’t recognize. My mum walks into the lounge sometimes and asks me “where’s my daughter? what have you done with her?” emphasizing the loss of femininity. Granted she NEVER hears the language but she does watch as my love for the game morphs me into the red hulk :-/
I started blogging on May 24, 2011, although in all honesty, blogging was not one of my goals when the year began. The idea just grew organically out of other goals I had, so I suppose that just goes to prove there's something to be said for not being too rigid about resolutions. Sometimes wonderful things just happen serendipitously!
Tea eggs
My upbringing was very middle class. My parents always went above and beyond to give us what we needed but not always what we wanted. My Mom is the woman who instilled in me my love for bargain shopping at places like Marshall's and TJ Maxx. I knew she had never spent this much on one item of clothing, not even for herself. Since I was just a selfish teenager, I never once stopped to think about the financial consequences for my parents. All I knew was I wanted that dress.
Challenge 2: January 15
no words.
I stroke her hair and kiss her cheek
Pastels look great on any skin tone, as a bridesmaid even to the attendees. As we transition into summer, think about the common colors that appear in this season more so than the others.
I will never, ever forget the exact moment I laid eyes on her for the first time. I was tired and very, very nervous. It was snowing like crazy outside, and the orphanage was extremely overheated. I'd been waiting all day to get there, and our trip had been delayed due to some "business" that was going on at the orphanage. So, it was now early evening and already dark outside. My facilitator ushered me inside where we removed our coats and put plastic booties on over our snow boots in a feeble attempt to keep the floors clean. They put me in the sparsely furnished, very warm Director's office and told me to wait. The walls were covered with photos of babies and toddlers who'd been adopted from there. Adoption announcements. Christmas cards. Birthday announcements. I looked at all of them at least 50 times. My palms were sweaty. I was lightheaded. Minutes seemed like hours. I could hear Russian being spoken and lots of movement in the hall outside the door. I kept thinking that they were about to open the door, but no. More waiting.
Ms. Jess
In short, Nietzsche is caught in the contradictions of class society: he wants hierarchy and elitism and the power that comes from dominating others, but without the messy, sickly, life-denying ideologies necessary to control the masses. He wants to be a king (or even just to watch a king, to know that there are kings) whose subjects submit of their own free will, without any need for the machinery of oppression.
Maybe it's because i cant wait for Spring to come, so we can start our excursions to the big outdoors!
So now here we go again — having a consultant attending a community meeting asking the same questions, getting the same answers and apparently not briefed of previous planning work conducted.
My Father’s Dragon by Ruth Stiles Gannett
Alfre Woodard (Down in the Delta)
I wish I knew how we stayed healthy for so long so I could repeat it for next winter. My only guess is that our systems have antibody overload from our illnesses last winter and any germs that enter our body were fought off without a chance.
Jessica Colley came next, a US expat, exceptionally well-travelled in her guise as travel writer, but longtime resident in Dublin. I've bumped into Jessica at workshops over the last few years, but hearing her read a body of work tonight really brought her particular voice into focus. Fragmentary and atmospheric, her poems conjured shades of their subjects as if layered together from ricepaper.
Well, they all thought that good counsel; and after that they went out of their booth to the point of the “ere,” 1 and there cut up a sod of turf in such wise that both its ends were still fast to the earth, and propped it up by a spear scored with runes, so tall that a man might lay his hand on the socket of the spear-head. Under this yoke they were all four to pass–Thorgrim, Gisli, Thorkel, and Vestein. Now they breathe each a vein, and let their blood fall together on the mould whence the turf had been cut up, and all touch it; and afterwards they all fall on their knees and were to take hands, and swear to avenge each the other as though he were his brother, and to call all the gods to witness.
Party Time and I hit a little impasse in our Credit Card Fraud scheme by the fact that we learned that a few online transactions require a Billing Address + we still can't come up with good cover for snapping folks' cards on our phones (ideas here would be appreciated).
– Florida Judge Halts Major State Prison Privatization Plan
The most active political group were the Socialist Workers - a shrill of Kentish girls in cardies led by a future accountant who looked like Béla Bartók. She focused on berating a politics lecturer for failing to see the sexism inherent in Tom Paine's "Rights of Man".
Jonathan’s coordinating minister, Dr. Ngozi Okonjo-Iweala, had in a statement explained that the 2012 Fiscal Framework earlier submitted to the National Assembly assumed 100 per cent subsidy removal and that only N155bn was provided for the carry-over of 2011 subsidy payments.
While this is spiteful, hurtful, disgusting and not least of all concerning regarding the attitudes of some men to rape, what happened next is, in my opinion, far more serious. People started naming the victim.
On his colourful liner notes to Dojo Cuts’ new album Take From Me, Russ Dewbury (of Jazz Rooms fame) calls the band the “undisputed champions of the sound” and says “Dojo Cuts go route 1 to your soul”. I couldn’t have put it better myself.
The John Stott we meet in “Inside Story” could be summarised as follows: He was a man of incredible self-discipline. He took seriously the challenge of Isaiah 1:18 “’Come now, let us reason together,’ says the Lord”, and was sometimes accused of “evangelical tidy mindedness”. But this gift of succinct clarity is unsurpassed in evangelical writing.
overcoming negativity,
Sunday was Mike's sister's birthday. We went to the mall to do some birthday shopping for my sisters and for his sister before heading to his parents' house to have dinner and birthday cake for his sister. I had a ton of luck and got great deals for Jenn. I'll share the deals after her birthday (4/7) so I don't spoil any surprises.
Today we're talking with Kassiane Sibley, a gymnast, swing dancer, neurology student, and autism advocate who recently joined the TPGA team as an Affiliate Editor.
Newt is only pretending to run for president while secretly looking for a 4th wife, but just in case he is also keeping his eyes open for an even younger and even prettier 5th wife.
Hannah (Lena Dunham) is lying in her hospital gown, rattling on nervously to the gynecologist about why she’s getting screened for sexually transmitted infections. She describes her lifelong fear of dying of AIDS. The doctor asks if she knows someone who died of it. “Umm, it’s more of like a Forrest Gump based fear,” she explains. “That’s what Robin Wright Penn’s character died of. So….”
Say it again, Momma.
ROUTINES
I loved picture books as a child and I love them now. When I was little I used to read Roald Dahl’s ‘The Enormous Crocodile’, illustrated by Quentin Blake, over and over again. I don’t really know why but it made me feel safe and the memory has stayed with me ever since.
I occasionally walk past the Seventh Day Adventist Church on 45th Street.
I spent the next three hours alternating between freezing on the hill and warming up sitting in my car, but finally at about 1345 we talked Alex into getting ready, and a few minutes later he took off, making it look very easy indeed. I immediately got my glider ready and once I’d got it under control after a bit of a gust I took off, hopefully making it look easy too! (It was!) By this time (1400), Alex was nice and high heading off towards Bath under a cloud street!
I have a birthday card to share today. This one is for my mom, who has a distaste for her birthday, but she loves cats just as much as I do, so I thought this would be perfect:
F: I love going off for a run in the mornings, with the dogs (Chips and LOL), it has to be the best way to start a day. After that I go around the paddocks feeding the ponies and checking that everyone had a good night, that is what makes me the happiest and is a real luxury. But maybe my biggest luxury is having the time to do so many different things, and time to see my friends and I have to admit that I spend a lot of time on the phone too!
Jackie Sayegh Duggan, 34
French San Domingo
Dried Fruit
I know that I’m allowing fear to take over and rule my thoughts and emotions right now. But I have to be honest with what’s going on in my head and my heart right now, otherwise I’m going to be completely overwhelmed with all of it.
“He wants me back.” She uttered solemnly.
The Vanishing (France/Denmark) directed by George Sluizer
We were shown a couple of steam box hangi - wooden boxes built into the ground to trap steam so that it can be used to cook food. Again, these are still used today; villagers often put their dinner in the hangi at the start of the day and return to collect it, cooked, at the end of the day. In the pool next to the hangi, some corn cobs were cooking using traditional methods - wrapped in a linen cloth, tied with a long rope with a brick at the end of it, and lowered into the pool, which is just below boiling point at the surface. Robert explained that meat couldn't cook in this way as the fat would react with the water with explosive consequences!
Truly One of the VERY BEST TV MOVIES of the YEAR!!!
Untouched, a memory no time can fade
(Keep an eye out for a can fight and a fuckin' human being as weapon fight!)
With all the chaos of opening the new location out the way this year, things at the fest ran a lot smoother than in the past. It was evident that a lot of time and energy was spent to make this year one of the best yet. The food was ready from the opening and there was plenty for everyone. Bottled water was available all over the brewery in plentiful quantities. The snacks were abundant and delicious. The taps were well manned, and the lines were always short-to-nonexistent, even for some most sought after beers.
His word! It is that Lamp to my feet, that Light to my path!
Banking has long used standardized forms for things like checks. Despite always having the same essential information in the same basic places, they can still be personalized infinitely. A couple of decades ago, all the medical insurers (including Uncle Dr. Sam) got together and agreed on a uniform claim form. (Granted their Explanation of Benefits forms are still all over the map, meaning my office manager has the same hassles trying to post payments as I do finding the data I need in the documents I upload; but I digress.)
upon life’s velvet cascade of time.
The Examining Attorney argued that SIKORSKY is primarily merely a surname, albeit a rare one. She asserted that SIKORSKY is the surname of Igor Sikorsky, Applicant's founder; that the term has no meaning in ordinary language; and that by its nature, the term has only surname significance.
And the wall I built around my heart has come down thanks to a wonderful caring man I met at the end of last year who made me see that all men are not the same. He gives me everything I ever dreamed of emotionally, in the short time we’ve know each other he’s stood with me through my emotional battles, forgiven my childlike outbursts and stood strong in faith and belief in us, he completes me and renders me whole. He provides understanding, a shoulder to cry on and an ear to listen without judgment he provides strength and courage to keep me working towards a better tomorrow and he gives me confidence through his encouragement to follow my heart and chase my dreams. But what I love most about him is that he loves me for me and not for anything else and embraces my family as they were his own.
Madoka: 350
Where has this author (science fiction) been all this time? This is a delightful story of a young girl who accidentally bonded with an alien symbiote; their growing friendship and trust; and the troubles she has in trying to mix with other children her age who are either imbued with magic or “normal”. It is fixed in a short span of time and the characters are excellently drawn. Little brother Peter has his good and bad moments as a pest or trusted brother. The aliens we meet are bonded with other symbiotes as well; and are believable. There is reference to bad guys but only glancing, they only come out once in a non violent way. This author is definitely good for more reading; I’m glad she has more for me to enjoy. The younger crowd will enjoy this and there isn’t anything objectionable to the parents.
Fine Homes Optimized – after less than a day, “Fine Homes Websites” are at the top of Google regarding this specific keyword as you see on the screenshot below. I can’t tell you how fast the article got there as I just checked it now, after 22 hours. Enough to say: mission fullfilled – and this at no extra cost!
1. Pick up cat and cradle it in the crook of your left arm as if holding a baby. Position right forefinger and thumb on either side of cat's mouth and gently apply pressure to cheeks while holding pill in right hand. As cat opens mouth, pop pill into mouth. Allow cat to close mouth and swallow.
Thanks for stopping by today...
Dany: Dany is now in the lap of luxury in Qarth. She’s confident and charming and her dragons are growing up and feeding themselves little bits of meat. She’s pretty damn happy this episode and looks gorgeous. First time we’ve seen her smiling in awhile. She says she wants her birthright back, and the extremely rich and smooth merchant Xaro Xhoan Daxos suggests they get married. He’ll be her consort, and she’ll get all his money. It’s more than enough to kick the ass of people back home. Her loyal guard Jorah disagrees, saying they can’t rely on him entirely and he’ll want something in return, maybe too much power honestly once they get there. Dany realizes that Jorah is very much in love with her. It’s awkward, but she does seem to trust his advice.
unseen.
Crescent rolls
or possibly *in* the tiger, who looks a bit shifty to me.
Delicate aromas with more toasty oak notes, cloves and Ginger spice too.
So what say you adoptive momma's who have been home awhile with your kiddos?? How often are you blogging? Are you telling your story anymore or am I the only one struggling to find the words and time, LOL.
You may be thinking now, “Wait, why is this card considered good while it is a 3 cost ally with only +1/+4?” well the answer is simple. Look at her printed powers! Harmonize is always fun to have as it gives you a chance to put some big guys on your board and she also has Mend. Her 1 damage is definitely not the best but with her 4 health it means she will not die that fast.
The second thing that will happen is that White people, who have nothing but goodwill for Blacks, will notice that the longer they honestly and frankly discuss race the more they will end up sounding exactly like “White supremacists” and so-called hard-line “racists.” This is not because they have “inherent racism” as leftists like to imagine, it is simply because the facts of the debate will push them in that direction.
The things of which I am certain are the pale pink wall color (please, Mr. Sugarplum?!), orb chandelier (sitting in a box in my guest room), ikat fabric for drapes (found for a steal at Hancocks last year), gold lamps with black shades, tufted chairs and wall decor. I think. Things always could change. Where I need you is helping me to choose the rug! I decided on the geometric chevron pattern because I think it's a nice juxtaposition to the large floral rug in the adjacent Living Room. And these rooms could use a dose of modern contemporary.
I had beautification
Luckily, my late post is for the letter F is about events that took place on Friday... perfect for a Flashback!
And so, I begin my journey…with “On Free Will” a 150 pages philosophical text.
On that basis, and until Mr Anwar can produce something concrete for the court, the appeal was going to be dealt with as it stood.
“According to The Daily Star, C5 has entered talks with the production company looking to extend their deal for the rights to the show, with plans to air another star-studded edition as early as this summer.”
On Friday, October 8th my grandpa passed away. It was a very sad day. The phone rang, I picked up the phone to hear my very sad and tearful father on the other end of the phone, "Amber....", he didn't have to say it....I already knew. I knew this day was coming, but I just wasn't ready for it. It saddened my heart to hear my dad in so much grief and pain.
OPPOSITION QUESTION NEED FOR IMMEDIATE ACTION
Velour Stickers - number and alphabet x 2
Speak up for standards – carry copies of Free Beach Etiquette – report criminal activity to police
Q: So you are Telling me that there is not a VIP or actor or sports man or Singer that you would name as a person that you could share a good Word for. And you would think…”He represents the beauty, intelligence, sacrifice, hope, poetry, substance and perfection I want to communicate with My bags” That is depressing for us men… You can’t name one single model, actor, singer, artist, street artist? No one?
It got me thinking about the “causes” of collisions. We know that the driver’s action, attitude, and choices are strong contributor factors in 90% (or more) of the collisions reported annually. However, I don’t think I know anyone who’d be willing to argue that drivers choose to be involved in a collision. At the same time, I don’t think they would defend the idea that collisions happen by pure chance, either.
Instead, I struck a compromise, picking up a pound of ground chicken to make these barbecue burgers I had flagged. I'm always looking for new variations on a traditional beef (or turkey) burger and these fit the bill. Topped with cheddar cheese, grilled red onions and extra barbecue sauce they're fun and flavorful - we both really enjoyed them. I'm looking forward to being able to grill them outside later this summer, maybe even with the one thing I eliminated from Josie's recipe (only because we didn't have it on hand): pulled pork! How good does that sound?
Like loops in her ears
Today I got to visit with my granddaughter and I was lovin'every minute of it. Natalee is now over two and a half months old and getting cuter by the minute. She's been such an inspiration and a blessing for all of us since my oldest son joined the Army.
Also, I just read somewhere that beetroot doesn't like manure. Probably now I know why I got such disappointing results.
This idea came about while I was stamping the Classic Scallop Borders. I stamped two in a line so it was a long strip and then cut them out. Once the strip was cut, it was scored at each of the top points of the scallop and then folded mountain/valley. I repeated this to make two strips and then adhered them together to make a rosette. The butterfly image is from Botanical Butterflies and has been stamped in Memento Tuxedo Black onto X-press It Blending Card and coloured with Copics (B000, YR12, YR16, YR18). This was cut out with Lacey Circle Nestabilites and glued to the front of the rosette. For the back, I've cut a circle, glued the popstick to it and then glued it to the back of the rosette.
55 long, oval and once more during the day feeds. They can clearly be dandruff, but they will truly adhere to the hair to which they are connected by a strong cement. Lice treatments can be bought over the counter. First, find out if you have had a blast in your area, at work, at school your child goes to and every that. You do not want to deal with all kinds of lice: Getting rid of lice seems to be a challenge for many people impacted by lice for quiet sometime now.
I just have this utter feeling of failure and though they’d never say it, I think my family would agree with that statement. I think they all had high hopes for me… as did I. I do spend a lot of time learning for fun but that doesn’t bring me any closer to a career. At one point in life, I was an award winning instructor at UNC-Chapel Hill and now I’m essentially a squatter who, at times, can’t afford toilet paper.
I never thought I would say this. I have started running, an activity that I have spent years of my life terrified to do. Thanks to my dear friend Chris, an epic marathon man and all-around athlete, I've found a shiny new outlet for all of this post-MFA energy.
- The opportunity to design scrapbook pages, cards, calendars and SO much more to capture your awesome life!
“They called me the hyacinth girl.”
“Make toast!” many of them said.
One thing you can usually rely on a W hotel to get right is the drinks. 2 weeks later, Fred is still talking about how good that lunchtime Mojito was. The champagne by the glass was served at exactly the right temperature with a cute little red raspberry bobbing in the bubbles. The San Diego W has a couple of other interesting bars on site, including a unique beach bar that I will post about another day.
Wow, I just talked A LOT!!!
Grabbing the window fences,
Fingers,eyes and ears all crossed!
Leave a comment if you have some other great ideas for us.
In 2005 it was as a member of the Advisory Council, that I started to notice, after the nation-wide success of councillors being elected in parish, town and borough, the start of the frustrations and discontent (which later became apparent at the 2005 Red White and Blue). Prior to the RWB there was a conference of the Regional Organisers and Advisory Council. The then head of security had made statements that were deemed to be too innovative and above his station to the Chairman and some of longstanding Head Office officials. Several months later, he was removed from his position.
Heh.
4) The most beautiful mullet you’ve ever seen. It’s not long, or even very full, but it’s situated on the head of one of the nicest ladies west of the Mississippi. She is Brenda, the Assistant Manager and she is awesome.
I am the puppet.
- Commenting on of our posts (100 points)
They're dancing to Sir Duke by Stevie Wonder.
A bit stale for a Laser Cats effort. But I’m a sucker for purposefully half-assed references like “Catch Me If You Can The Terminal.” B
Fry the onion, and more crushed garlic, and add the pasatta, reggae reggae sauce fresh herbs, simmer then add the beans.
Dare I say that I think tomorrow I’m going to the local mall! Three times out of the hospital in one week and to be honest, I’ve been finding it very enjoyable. I just pack up my laptop, get the bus to the mall which takes about 20 minutes, do some window shopping, OK, and some real shopping too (!) and sit in a nice cafe with a coffee and some biscuits and go on my laptop, mess around, go through emails, other people’s blogs, my blog etc etc. Then just make my way back slowly to the hospital, and it’s been a nice time and has taken up some time too which is good!
Just how much are you planning on drinking? Come on, now. The restaurant is allowing you to bring your own wine, so let’s not get carried away with the privilege, ok. Stick to no more than three bottles.
The night of the workshop, I went to see Candice performing in the School of Contemporary Bellydance end of year show as a guest performer. My goodness she is amazing! A different style to my lovely teacher (Paige Adamson of Abbracia Bellydance, amazing in her own right) but really awesome. She did a dance with two pairs of isis wings, and somehow managed to unclip them very subtly to take them off for a drum solo. Her second dance was great as well, she managed to work comedy into it, which I've actually never seen so far in live performances. It was great to see such an amazing dancer have fun with it and not take herself too seriously.
Author: DiNae’ Billingsley
Catherine self-published the first three books and began taking them into schools, inspiring children with her love of books and reading. She set herself a target: 500 books to be sold by Xmas; another 500 by Easter; 1500 by the summer. Each target was met and exceeded.
Montmartre (special mention for street artists and musicians)
The Capitol Murders series by Margaret Truman
And what did we get during that time? Did we score at all?
Think about giving away freebies through your social media profile. I can’t think of a single person I know who wouldn’t love to get something for free, so it’s a great technique for drawing in new followers. Choose a product or service you want to highlight, then post your free offering to the most popular freebie pages and forums.
I am so grateful to Peter for doing these dinners year after year. and I always knew that it would end oneday.. now that day is upon us, well truthfully, I am sad. bereft even.
Best Drama: Winner – LSTV (One Week)/ Highly Commended – AirTV (Run)
Nymph is similar to Katie, but less pastel and a bit brighter, and maybe a hair darker. It's a good alternative to Katie for darker girls who might find that Katie could look ashy on them.
Here is Gohmert’s speech, with his discussion of the disappearing language beginning around the 30 minute mark:
15) One word...Cheney! I'm almost inspired to compose something to the tune of "Maria." (Almost. Because to do so would be to spend valuable minutes of my life thinking of him. And that I will not do.)
Being developed. We as women are going through the re-molding process. It is here we are refined. As strong women working in love and unity we are or should be that Proverbs 31 Woman. We become the complete helpmates to our men. You see we give birth to young men and women everyday. We set the tone. We nurture the womb until the fruit is ripened, and then we give birth.
We pulled up at an upscale apartment complex in a well-to-do area of the city. There are a lot of young professionals in this city. People around my age with careers, salaries, pensions, car payments and regular apoinments; set on paths with far more definite outcomes than the one I am still riding out.
33Then the death of Eleazar, the son of Aaron, took place; and his body was put in the earth in the hill of Phinehas his son, which had been given to him in the hill-country of Ephraim.
I wanted more shawl body than edging, compared to last time, so I kept increasing the stockinette section until I had 122 stitches on each side of the 2 spine stitches; I completed the first set of charts, then repeated charts B and A once more, which left me with a mere 10 or 15 yards of yarn left after binding off.
Perhaps I'll start a trend?
Life-giving water
mythology. Bush's early music and image exude much the same kind of
I can’t escape. It has to be done. I know it will all go well. I have the best surgeon in the country for this complex surgery.
Well, good luck, Democrats.
Hey Tony. Thanks for taking the time out to talk to me about your new film, ‘Paris 60′.
Matt & Suleen
Cough.
my son as he was twenty-eight years ago.
Additionally, he argued, God shut down major airports in the New York area "so that people who were hoping to fly to do something of a gay nature would have to take a train or a bus, so it might be days before the gay thing they were going to do could occur."
is it what we all wait for
So… back to my accident parting shot at work today… it was epic. I peeked around to see if anyone was nearby, that starting flapping the air around me with a notepad I had on my desk. Once I was pretty sure it was gone, I sprayed a little body spray in the air, just to give it that fresh smell again. New lesson for today: spraying perfume on top of funk does NOT cancel the funk out. I already knew this, but I thought I could get away with it. Wrong!! So now I’m getting whiffs of poot mingled with whiffs of… cucumber melon. Not cute OR dainty.
Also gone was pretty much every picture I’ve ever taken with my digital camera. Including every picture I took when I was with my ex fiancé.
“I am proud of and appreciate Terry and all the other countless individuals who daily work with our most vulnerable citizens in order to help them reclaim their life,” said Rep. Morgan.
I have so much to share and I promise it won't be another month before I update- I hope to post much more regularly. If you made it this far, thanks for reading! =)
If you never have any problem pill-swallowing, or don't know anyone who does, don't bother going on reading this - just try swallowing one of these instead!
This year, two of my children did artwork in school that was then reproduced in greeting cards for Christmas. One of our friends sent us a card with the artwork of my daughter (so thoughtful!). I think you’ll agree, it is perfect:
You will need/we used:
Mitt Romney said some very conservative things today. He was largely ignored. The left wing media pulled some clips out of context and made him seem heartless. The right wing media also pulled some clips out of context, ignored his entire record, and called him a liberal.
A heart felt Battle cry
We'd all love to see the plan
1) The illegal alien student bailout will NOT be limited to “children” — but, in fact, would put illegal aliens in their 30s and 40s on a “path to citizenship.” Taxpayers “would also be on the hook for all federal benefits the DREAM Act seeks to offer illegal aliens, including student loans and grants.
By doing this, you are immersing yourself in the truth that only now truly exists, unhindered and unfettered by the human conception of time. Also, you are opening yourself to the universality of present consciousness, which is always alive in the world.
What teamwork tips have you learned from reality shows?
Then leave me a comment and let me know what you did :)
Bottom Row: Summer - fresh Peaches (which are only available in Summer here); Winter - Yoghurt Snow with blue sanding sugar Frost; Autumn - Cheese Leaves.
Of the S,D.Padres
As a parent one of the remedies lice home that you can do is buy a comb that is intended to comb them. There is strong evidence on this issue so far. Specialized shoes will nit come home equipped with magnifying lamps that allow them to detect small remaining eggs. Head lice are spread really easily and you can get them by coming in contact with an infected people. In this study, direct visual examination alone resulted in an underestimation of active infection.
She is extremely gracious for the awards and accolades she has received and I look forward to seeing her talk here in Victoria next week.
I got to be Kate's "plus one" last night at a five-course wild salmon tasting put on for media types by McCormick and Schmick's to mark the opening of the brief Copper River fishing season.
I've used the owl stamp from Sarah's Woodland Whimsies stamp set and used, die cuts from Nestabilities, a punched border, punched leaves and used a Dymo labeller to punch out my sentiment.
Record: 25-8
I find myself counting the days and weeks until January 2nd. I think about things in terms of before I get my birth certificate or after I get my birth certificate. And then I wonder what it is I’ll do once I have the name. Will I try to find her? What if my birth father’s name isn’t listed? Do I have siblings? There are a lot of things to think about, and talk about, which brings me to the reason for this blog.
The heroes of his books include private investigators and DC cops, but also record-store clerks. short-order cooks and waitresses, animal-control officers, and TV/stereo salesmen. The bad guys are often very bad indeed, and are almost always involved either directly or indirectly in the trafficking of illegal drugs.
The third and Final locomotive in the lashup is MP GP35 #622. Built by EMD in February of 1964, the locomotive carried the frame number 7706-8 and Serial number 28930. She was built as MP 622 and carried this number until the 1970′s MoPac locomotive renumberings, when she got the number 2520. The locomotive carried the number until she to was retired in February of 1983. She, along with 44 other locomotives (Included the mentioned MP 660) was sent back to EMD in May of 1984 to be traded in for credit towards brand new EMD SD50′s that the MoPac ordered. She was cut up for scrap by the Pielet Brothers in Chicago in early 1985.
Cumin powder- 1/2 tsp
He is just another problem in this world that cannot be solved.
In New York City, there is whining about homosexuals being 'discriminated against' in the annual parade. As if the St. Patrick's Day Parade should be an occasion to 'celebrate' one's sexual predilections publicly.
So now what? It's time to take a look back at holidays past to see what we did and if it was a success or not. Take a moment to think back on past holidays to see what helped us and what did not. By doing this, we will improve our weight loss success!
to the end of the light
In a near-future Edinburgh, police are having no luck hunting a serial killer known simply as X. By chance his 34th victim manages to survive her ordeal and is able to give the police a good enough description of her attacker that they are able to identify a suspect. But the authorities know that X will not come quietly and, if they do catch him, should he be put to death for his vicious crimes, or should he instead be psycho-analysed to understand just what event could have created such a monster in the first place?
We need to rise high above them…and smile.
Now I know of a few medical issues that my 2 year old charge has - but not the diagnosis. N told me that my two year old charge may have the same thing his mom has. MB is very sensitive about her condition - if she has one. N told me this.
By the way, would you like to see the shoes that were delivered to my door today? Here they are, Jambu Odyssey:
Standing on this mountaintop
For hundreds of years the Islamic world had sighed for this moment. Millions of pious Muslims had to linger in awful uncertainty. Even the cleverest scholars could never agree on a universally agreed solution. But on Monday of this week, it was at that point.
Cardstock - White and dark blue
There is a lot of walking and climbing on the battleship. M is 5 but she's pretty short for her age, so she had to get help at times. For example, my husband took them inside a gun turret and had to help her into it and out of it. There are also lots of steep stairs that are almost like ladders, so younger kids may have a hard time getting onto all levels. If they can easily climb up and down the structures at playgrounds, they should be fine.
SUM Function
I don't know about you, but whenever I opened up the listening center for my kiddos to use in past years, it was always so stressful. First, most of my audio books were still on tape. Do you know a child who even knows what a tape is anymore? So, explaining how to use a tape player was a challenge. Then, I had six pairs of headphones in one large perpetual knot. That's always a delight! And, while I have always had a very large library of audio books, I generally have only one or two copies of each book, so children had to share. This became it's own monster...always arguing over who gets to hold the book and the inevitable child who just has to sit and listen because he can't see. Doesn't really sound like an ideal situation to enjoy listening to books and improve reading fluency, does it?
I finally went home happy that night, full of stories of the past and the present. And as I approached the gate, I saw my mother cooking dinner with the radio beside her. I kissed her and and as I take off my shoes I heard a familiar voice on the radio. Since she first broadcasted in DZRH as a correspondent, IRISH MAY IGNACIO has been my mother’s favorite. She first broadcasted on-air when one of the female reporters died of an unfortunate accident. She was reporting about the awards night which she recently covered. I suddenly perked when I heard her say the name JOSE MARI GARCIA who, as she related, recently won the Palanca Award for his book of poems for Filipino children.
For many reasons, it is time for Georgia and other states to abolish the death penalty. A recent poll showed 61 % of Americans would choose a punishment other than the death penalty for murder.
Bill Prusoff did not witness the end of his dream of YIISA, as he died shortly before Yale’s decision. His dream is still alive and his and Charles’ idea of universalism has already spread around the world. Groups like British Muslims for Israel are indicating a new tendency in world history: moderate Muslims are waking up AND they get support in the West. No longer from Yale, though. However, at some point even Yale University will learn its lesson.
Next up is some wibbly psychedelic music that was recently premiered on the excellent blog 20 Jazz Funk Greats. the artist MOTION STUDIES has release his debut EP “Hearts Will Beat” and it’s a 3-track smash and grab of creepy electro pop stuff that is a little chillwave-y but with a real infusion of house, is far too danceable for that. Clicking rhythms and minimalist synth sounds with some decent vocals. A good result methinks.
I was so happy to be selected to review a fun math facts game called Math Rider. The software is a fun game where a horse gallops off on a quest - each obstacle it must leap is a math fact. The faster your child types an answer the faster the horse goes through the quest. The game takes place in a magical land called the Land of Ray and your child rides on a horse named Shadow. My girls loved this - I mean what girl doesn't want to own a horse. We also loved the interactive part of the game where each quest revolved around a story. Positive reinforcement occurs in the rewards that children earn during each quest for answering math facts correctly. I was also quiet pleased with the fact that getting an answer wrong did not lead to the game ending or "losing" which upsets my younger daughter - the horse just stops briefly and gives the correct answer to the math fact before galloping again to the next obstacle.
Hercules is actually a real character in this movie--he starts out wanting nothing more than to stay at home with his wife, Deinaria, and after he gets shanghaied by his son and the king into the mission to Atlantis, he initially refuses to help at all with amusing results. Later, as he believes his son to be dead, we see more depth in the character than I've seen in any other movie of this type.
Well, tonight was their last concert of the year, and Jk was excited and nervous about it. I reminded her to look up and smile when she sang, that people want to see her heart for Jesus in her singing, and shining from her beautiful little face. I was so proud of her, because she worked on her music for a couple of hours today to make sure she had all the words memorized, including the Spanish translation for Via Dolorosa. Tonight she was focused, smiled, and kept her focus on the director, and the audience, and not only did her growing confidence show, but her love of the Lord Jesus. I think this year she has taken giant steps to overcome her shyness. It’s funny because if you give her a script for a play or sketch, she has no lack of confidence. She loves to act, and is so silly, much like JoAnne Worley, who is a distant cousin of mine (my 5th cousin to be exact.) Jk does slapstick, loves to do funny voices, and when she is acting on stage she shines, but when it comes to singing…she’s shy.
31. One of Madonna’s childrens books
I just wanted to let ya'll know why I won't be on here as much as I'd like. Prayers are greatly appreciated...we truly believe in God's power to heal and bring comfort. Thanks in advance and big cyber hugs to my blogger friends!
It’s interesting to see how so many tales about science seem to warn us not to take it too far. Whether it is time traveling that will disrupt the universe or building androids that will one day overthrow the humans, it’s a warning example of an experiment gone terribly wrong.
I am rather awakening to a vague desire.
You can take a variety of steps to ensure your retirement years are not only enjoyable but also fruitful. Do all you can to keep your mind and body healthy. You can learn more information from articles such as this and from various newsletters targeted at people like you. By learning new ways to stay healthy and strong, your sunset years can be the most rewarding of your life.
In the barn are a couple of things. 1) A young girl asleep in the hay and 2) six men planning on dividing up half a million dollars in stolen loot (or $106.25 million today!). Well, when there is money and guns, guns usually come into play. Five of the men decide that they can kill the other one (the banker) and have more loot. So they do just that. The gunshots awaken the young girl (Cindy) and also alert Jonah that something is up. The girl tries to sneak out but the mean hear her and try to catch her. She hits one with a branding iron and bolts for the door. Outside she runs into a hay field and ends up finding Jonah Hex, hiding there himself.
The wages of sin are catching up to me now. (Well, that and impending Old Fartdom.) My one remaining brain cell must be nourished and cherished. When I get back to Norway, I am going off the sauce for a while. Need to detox. Sunday was a BAD HANGOVER day. Holy crap, I wanted to die. The only cure was Mexican food, and even that did not wholy cure it. It took two naps, the Shrimp Tostadas at Matt's and about 8 ibuprofens to even get me close to feeling human again. ARg.
Overall my gluten free experience has been wonderful.
Po finally found something that satisfied him more than food. In taking seriously the responsibility assigned to him, he discovered that filling the gap in his soul was far more satisfying than filling the gap in his gut.
Bian, who is the Ba’Kelalan assemblyman, said the opposition parties were concerned about BN’s “wild spending”.
Who: Cody
The other evening I received a telephone message from my #1 grand daughter who has just had her 5th Birthday. It went like this:
The other three left behind nodded. “Good luck, Commander,” Marcus called out as the other two vanished outside the tiny meadow. This exercise had been done so many times–sometimes with fewer than three people against a larger contingent.
P.S. "Welcome to the Vast Rational Conspiracy" was a chapter heading in Clay A. Johnson’s book. I found it incredibly humorous and ironic, at the author’s expense.
Below you will find the sheet music to "Christ Arose." I encourage you to read the verses of this hymn by clicking here. You can also hear the hymn at the same link.
U.S. bankruptcy, the bankruptcy is in each and every letter you send,
From 8 to 10 a.m. on Thursday, Nov. 25, The Salvation Army Central Oklahoma Area Command will serve a hearty Thanksgiving breakfast to any and all who arrive at the annual Thanksgiving Dinner at the Bricktown Coca-Cola Event Center, 425 E. California.
1. Impressement of American soldiers onto British ships. This also was happening with French, but the British were also causing other problems.
Can love blossom in the most unlikely situation?
They are self-referencing institutions that serve themselves.
Following some takeaways from my listening:
‘Mental retardation’ was a phrase which was long used at the other end of the testing spectrum. The phrase, I suspect, was used because it was more acceptable than previously-used terms and was therefore thought-of as being kinder and less offensive. It is now pretty-much non-PC (which is what I implied in my previous blog). But why?
Tony Stark : Ok
Catherine like Persona 3 and 4 divides the gameplay into two parts in this case the puzzle and the social. The puzzle elements consists of you pushing and pulling blocks to create staircases to reach the top of a crumbling tower. What makes it unique is that blocks don’t have to have anything under it to keep it from falling. Blocks that are connected by edges will not fall. This combined with items and various types of blocks (many are lethal), sheep getting in your way and monsters chasing you up the tower makes for a challenging puzzle experience.
The development objective of this project is to support the SVP by enabling the riparians to form a range of basin-wide development scenarios, and specify the benefits accruing from the implementation of such scenarios (together with some notion of how benefits will be shared). Fundamentally, the project aims to provide an opportunity for riparian dialogue that can include a wide range of society and that will develop common visions of cooperative development in sectoral or thematic areas. (NBI SDBS, 2001)
If anyone else is interested in organizing with me, I would love to hear what you are working on. One of the reasons that I actually posted this was to help me stay on track. I have a very bad habit of getting bored and not finishing what I started. I just want to say a big Thank-You to all that take the time to post - it truly does keep me motivated!!!
What is/was you favorite subject in school?
As you exhale send that feeling of peace to Ryan’s family
To make the streusel: In the bowl of a stand mixer fitted with the paddle attachment, beat the flour, both sugar, cinnamon and salt on low to combine and break up any brown sugar lumps. With the mixer still on low, add the butter and beat until it is completely incorporated into the dry ingredients, about 2-3 minutes - the mixture will resemble wet sand. Transfer the streusel to another bowl and set aside.
L’ARGENT earned Bresson the Director’s Prize at the 1983 Cannes Film Festival and the Best Director Award by the American National Society of Film Critics.
After they part ways, Jonnie find some ditch somewhere to sleep in. Despite the fact that he is just passing through and can't afford to get involved, he finds himself thinking about Joanne.
When her best friend spoke the words, “Your husband has been coming on to me,” Janet’s jaw nearly hit the floor. She blamed her friend for tempting him and maybe even making the whole thing up. For Janet, her husband’s denial sounded far better than the truth of his betrayal.
This and also other BMX video games on-line supply gamers any private room experience with a new internet, where they can get a peek of what it is love to generate a motorbike with a palm track or even the discipline. Given the risk which goes and with this extreme activity, we can consider yourself lucky to possess BMX game titles on the internet to be able to effort these kind of tricks in the home.
I do wonder, though, if there is cause for concern. What will their future significant others think? Will they find the wrapping skill masterful or seriously lacking? If the latter, I hold my husband accountable. It’s only natural. After all, he had more occasions to teach them how to wrap gifts with my birthday and Mother’s Day over the last 15 or so years.
Even the most gangster of troublemakers is going to pick up his or her trash after that.
performance) gained from
Blendability: Really easy – it is so easy to blend, almost like water and it blends like a dream
Or perhaps that you were trying to do a “bboy” style shoulder spin in your sleep? Nah, me neither.
3). And, finally, unlike the Secret Service, Young’s actions had no larger, political ramifications which are potentially damaging to the global concerns of an entire country.
Balvenie Single Barrel 15yr – 47.8%
Strange calls were coming into the state police post about weird activities happening under the four twelve bridge, which is located at a the lake. Police suspected that drug activity or prostitution was going on under the bridge. However, they couldn’t have been traveling farther down the wrong road. The bridge was secretly outfitted with hidden video cameras by law enforcement. Men from Loathsome Creek, Poverty, and four surrounding counties were caught on video, living on the down low. Discretion under the bridge was nonexistent. All the men were totally dedicated to their explicit behavior. Acquaintances became lovers quicker than a lightening strike. Delmar Dude was one of those men.
But I know you’re the only one
My sole occupation is love.
Hello again- I am feeling a bit lonely today. You see, no one has entered into the discussion with me or given thier thoughts on my questions...
Tamara: Tamara Amalia Jorvi-Karashan. And yours?
Even under my blah, yucky, gray cloud, my friends are so good to me.
Doodling that I yelled at her for because she used my "special" felt-tip permanent pen that I only use for special things like writing out cards, invitations, etc. and she "wasted all that ink and once it's gone, it's gone!"
Whether it was turning right from the left-hand lane of a four-lane street or attempting to merge their bus into a three-inch gap, Peruvians wave their hand in a wordless display that can be roughly translated as, “I am about to do something incredibly silly, reckless, and/or dangerous. By waving my hand, you have been warned and I am absolved from all liability for what will occur in the next five seconds.”
A second challenge has been filed in the OMB, hot on the heels of last week's challenge submitted by David Boundy and 29 other signatories. The second challenge is authored by Richard B. Belzer, on behalf of undisclosed clients. Notes Belzer,
Then there is me. The anomaly. The aberration. I’m not one or the other, but something new.
Key Lesson: Christianity is for people who know they’ve failed and want help
To say that I'm stressed out about it would be an understatement. It's like jumping out of a plane, and hoping someone catches up to you and gets a parachute on you before you hit the ground.
Something that has been discussed at the Money Mastery weekends are the six human needs, which are as follows in no particular order;
Raspberry strippers are basically a twist on thumbprint cookies, which I’ve never made, but have eaten plenty of times. They looked so pretty, I just had to try them. But "pretty", pretty much meant they'd be a tad tedious, and seeing that I had a long night of pierogi-making fun ahead of me, I went out of my way to speed up the process. I got out all the ingredients and portioned them in advance, and even cleaned up and put things away as I was going. I was on a roll.
Go, Kiwi! And he called him "Dad" instead of "the chief."
It gave us classic best bitters, pale ales, Belgian strong ales, pilsners and Barley wines. The templates for virtually every beer in existance. Old school brewing doesn't try and re-invent itself, it's about quality, consistency and usually, simplicity. I love brewing simple beers. Daleside Bitter was always easy peasy and Mordue Workie Ticket is a bundle of joy. Crystal malt and English hops are as compatable as ham and pease pudding.
Gareth
At this time, the Bridges Authority financing plan will likely get a ‘rubber stamp’ approval from Kentucky Public Transportation Infrastructure Agency (KPTIA) and it will proceed to the Federal Highway Administration for review. Please be assured that this organization, No2BridgeTolls.org, and many hundreds of volunteers are keeping an eye on this issue and will keep you posted as we have updates. The issue of tolls is still very much a ‘ball in play’ and is not a “done deal” as some would have you believe.
heirloom gems
IMMEDIATE TASKS FOR REVOLUTIONARY WORKERS IN THE OWS MOVEMENT!
Friday night we are grilling up some chicken breasts marinated in a sesame ginger marinade along with rice and salad. One of our favs.
I know all the words to the songs of Mary Poppins
Earlier this month, the Human Rights Tribunal of Ontario (HRTO) awarded $5,000 to a black female newspaper carrier who insisted she had been arrested by police in early 2007 only because of her skin colour.
He said they’ll call this the Black Holocaust soon enough
There is an administration fee of 15€ per application. Applicants should e-mail info@losgazquez.com with their name, address and passport number/ID (Spanish legal requirement) stating their intent to enter whereupon they will receive instructions on paying the entry fee via PayPal.
Main Course:
Commenters also provided me with further examples to consider. What if a student had come to school wearing Nazi or Ku Klux Klan gear, or a T-shirt with an anti-minority group slogan? What if a student had worn a Hitler costume to Fictional Character Day, and this greatly upset someone whose family had been affected by the Holocaust? Would it be right to make such a student remove his or her costume?
Today, we remember the ultimate sacrifice made by Jesus Christ on the cross. We remember His tears and grief, His pain and sorrow. We remember how the disciples abandoned Him and the soldiers mocked Him. The religious leaders rejected Him as His mother wept.
See, after two days of hot chocolate and oatmeal cookies warm from the oven, of tromps through our neighborhood and gazing at the moon on the breast of you, I began to get bored.
The streets of Buenos Aires were totally empty today after 11 PM. I met up with a local porteno to visit Puerto Madero, the beautifully renovated old trading port of Buenos Aires, where giant cranes lifting goods from ships to warehouses and back still stand dockside as historical relics. Old ships with their canons (to fend off those pesky pirates of the high seas) have permanently docked to double as museums. The magnificent Puenta de la Mujer, an elegant pedestrian bridge in the shape of a harp, connects the two sides of the water. The entire Puerto was *totally* deserted, we had all of it to ourselves.
Most everything in this jewellery store was out of my price range (but I did buy a gorgeous charm for my charm bracelet). Why did we visit? I like "firsts" and this company is the oldest jeweller in North America. I am such a magpie, so just ogling the wares was fun, but I also like a bit of "everyday" history. Sure, sites dedicated to monumental events are important, but this store represents a tiny bit of ordinary history and that is interesting to me. Plus, they are home to the gurgling cod.
Hitler may have engraved people’s “numbers” on their forearms but God says, “Behold, I have engraved you on the palms of my hands” (Is 49:16).
Miller-Heidke has a tremendous voice with great range. In fact, she’s a classically trained opera singer who has performed professionally with Opera Queensland. On “Liberty Bell,” she is actually singing mostly in a lower register than normal so, at times, I forget that the vocalist I’m hearing is really Miller-Heidke. I’m not sure if it’s intentional or not, but it’s not until a couple of vocal holds at the end of the album’s closing track, the Gary Numan-esque “The Plane Went Down,” when you really hear the operatic quality of Miller-Heidke’s voice break through.
Nowhere left to hide
Customary
Chrystopher: -I’m so glad that came across for you. It’s just how I intended this book to be: a Clark Gable family photo album. Clark himself was quite the amateur photographer, as you can see by the cover photo, and I was able to identify some photos in the book as having actually been taken by him, which I thought gave a certain intimacy to the book. I would have liked to have discovered more but, as I’m sure you can appreciate, they’re not easy to find. I thought that this kind of format would allow me to be a tad more informal and just tell the stories about the photos themselves.
God tells us in 1 Peter 3:1 to submit to our husbands the way Christ submitted to God. But remember, that even Christ spoke up about his concerns to the Lord in Matthew 26:39 "My Father, if it is possible, let this cup be taken from me . . ."
Happy dances occur.
How do things stand at present? As we have stated, the regular army has 106,000 soldiers. It can, in principle, be supplemented by the 33,000 members of the Territorial Army, and the 134,000 soldiers of the reserve for a total of 273,000 troops. Under standard counter-insurgency calculations as described above, this would allow a counter-insurgency force of 54,600, capable of fighting a standard counter-insurgency in a population of 2.73 million people. Our key assumption in this document (erring on the pessimistic side though it probably is) has been that our government(s) will keep us on a steady course towards Islamization until a crisis occurs. We have argued that this crisis cannot be more than twenty years away, so let us assume that it is exactly twenty years away. The Muslim population of the UK has risen by about 60% in the last ten years, to 2.9 million people. If we extrapolate this growth trend for another twenty years, there will be approximately 7.4 million Muslims in the UK. If we assume that the core conflict zone contains this population and a British population twice as large, then the conflict zone will contain about 22 million people. A counter-insurgency operation fought in this zone would require 440,000 troop-equivalents, which would necessitate a 2.2 million-strong force. We have already shown that the entire British Army, including reservists and the Territorial Army, has only 273,000 troops, almost exactly one eighth of the required number. If we assume that the logistical and psychological advantages of fighting so close to home (i.e. in our home) would allow troops to spend one half of their time in theatre rather one fifth (six month tours of duty alternating with six months elsewhere), then we would still have only 136,500 troop-equivalents out of the desired total of 440,000, or about 31% of the whole.
Ahhh.. Oats... Horsefood as my eldest sister would call it...
Any Christian uncomfortable with the idea that we should have mercy and sympathy for the marginalized should be radically uncomfortable with Jesus. As Christians, whenever we look at another human being our first thought must be to see their beauty and nobility as a human being bearing the image of God.
it is ambrosia for its heart
I had quite a hard time getting into it though. I had seen the 2006 movie (underrated) on an England vacation before ever picking up one of the games and I instantly fell in love with the atmosphere and especially the music.
Why? Because mankind procreates, animals reproduce! Processes such as IVF reduce human procreation to an artificial mechanical function.
because...
In response to the inaccurate reporting and outright lies generated by the main stream "controlled" media, the National Socialist Movement is being forced to issue statements and a press releases to set the record straight. It's unfortunate that so called "responsible people" working in the "public trust" will resort to such treachery in the wake of such a tragedy. Here's the text of the email sent to SDelikat@azfamily.com who wrote the above article:
Last year, Vesuvius led the vanguard of Belgian strongs that have lately appeared across the state. (An odd style to crash Beervana's hoppy gates, as it happens. Unlike English strongs, Belgian strongs are approachable and sweetish. Widely appreciated, they are nevertheless not the types of beer you typically find in a Portland pub.) I am slightly reluctant to give an honest review, because Vesuvius is a rare and interesting enough beer that everyone should go buy a bottle. Still, it cannot meet the standard set by Duvel, Delirium Tremens, et al.
Hat Vine:
I got heartbroken over this platonic relationship and got thinner and sadder.
Until we do.
The same thing goes for the bus attack in which seven Somalis attacked a young Norwegian girl. Only Dagbladet and Nettavisen.no covered the case, as far as I know. And they only had two or three articles about it.
During this new decade, may God open your heart and mind to the ways in which He is moving in your life. My father's favorite verse and the one that is inscribed on his tombstone is Isaiah 43:19 "See, I am doing a new thing! Now it springs up, do you not perceive it? I am making a way in the desert and streams in the wasteland."
color. Every aspect of their public life will be subject to constant
We got to our seats early, and while we were waiting they played some of the absolute worst jazz music I have ever heard in my life. The squealing horns sounded for all the world like someone had stepped on a cat. By the time Mr. Cosby took the stage, I had a screaming headache.
The Greenville News, recently granted access to some of the trial records and police reports, offers some chilling accounts: The attitudes of the time are reflected in the casual manner in which one of the defendants, Hubert Carter, explained in his statement to police how he joined the mob.
The first order of business was painting the base color. Pottery Barn Kids teamed up with Benjamin Moore to pick their paint colors, meaning that every paint color you see in PBK stores or catalogs is a Benjamin Moore paint color and can be purchased from a Benjamin Moore retailer. Our local PBK store gave us a free pack of paint swatches. We picked the swatch that matched the photo in the catalog (Iced Lavender), then took it to be color matched for a less expensive brand of paint at our local hardware store.
ME - (Eventually...) Er....
Some element of discipleship must include learning to walk out of old things and into new things. And in reality, it is always messier than how books describe it. Ideas eventually slam into people, which always creates mess. And, side note here…I am continually dumbfounded when I meet folks in ministry who love ideas but aren’t as comfortable with people and the mess they bring.
To still polarized minds and lower frequency egos, if the sky doesn’t turn purple tomorrow or the oceans boil then all this Mayan Calendar and Ascension stuff is pure delusional bullshit. To the integrated, no longer polarized mind, tomorrow is another major turning point energetically. To the non-polarized mind and heart, entering the Ninth Wave phase tomorrow is entering the final stretch and seeing the finish line only a short few yards in front of us. Some know what tomorrow will trigger in us Starseeds, Lightbearers, Lightworkers, Indigos, the Galactic Center, within mass humanity, and within all global lower frequency patriarchal systems. We know that starting tomorrow the compressed and accelerated simultaneous death/birth stage will fully activate across Earth. Nothing and no one on Earth or off can hide from this Process and its energies.
kanistha-adhikari.
Yes!!
Irish Eyes
Yob, Yob, Yob – I need to get my ass out there and find me a second yob, y’all! There’s really no excuse. I want to apply for 2 jobs a week. I should really be applying to more but I’m aiming low, so when I say I applied for 3, I can really WOW you guys. I also really need the additional income.
Uneasily,given his interaction with youths in the course of his work, I enquired why Dirty Dave was 'dirty'.
Eventually John, Jr. tore down his original house and constructed an exuberantly Victorian one in its place, in the French Second Empire style. The four-story, five bedroom, brick and stone house featured six fireplaces, black walnut woodwork, etched glass doors, brass doorknobs and hinges, detailed ironwork, plaster moldings, stained glass windows, floors inlaid with fifteen different types of wood, and yes, the very first indoor toilet of any house in Austin (Sa-lute!). There is even a huge letter “B” elaborately carved into a chimney on the west side of the house. Amazingly, this palace was built for only $49,000, and was serving as a YMCA before the Texas Classroom Teachers Association bought and restored it.
I felt like everything she was saying to me was striking a cord. She wasn't just speaking about her and her own experiences, but she seemed to know what I was dealing with as well. As we talked on about our wants for the future, she reminded me that when I don't succeed, while I may view it as failure, it doesn't have to be that way. What a crazy thought.... It's not a failure. It's God simply saying "No, not yet." Or "No, I have better plans for you and it doesn't include this route." Of course this epiphany has been recently challenged. While I know that God has great plans for me,
309"Come, sister, come!" (it said, or seem'd to say)
JT - So let me get this quite right then. What we’re saying at the moment is that the SPL, if any club that is burdened with debt and is struggling to keep going and we have Rangers in that position just now, any club, like tomorrow, three clubs could say to the SPL, well look, do you know what, we are going into administration, they will take their 10 point deduction because that’s what it is at the moment and we’ll get rid of all that debt. Clubs that are maybe in the league and are safe. We’ll get rid of that debt and pay 10p, 5p in the pound and that’s ok?
and I think she has talent....
Now that things are slowing down, I’ve had more of a chance to reflect on what just happened. It seems weird to look at my life and know that I was able to get a job in Japan and live and work there for 5 years. It’s often the stuff that dreams are made of and now it already feels like it was just a dream. Although I certainly had things that pissed me off about Japan, I really do miss it there.
Pacifica & Bamboo ink
Saturday featured the panel I was super excited for: Scream Queens! With P.J. Soles, Linnea Quigley, Heather Langenkamp, and Mark Patton. I can hear the cliche record screech now. Mark Patton played Jesse in A Nightmare on Elm Street 2: Freddy’s Revenge, a role which would be, stereotypically, played by a girl. There are so many good ideas in Freddy’s Revenge that, for me, simply didn’t work in execution, not to mention how it simply doesn’t fit in the canon. The make-up and score, in particular, are fantastic. And the actors are better than the material they’re given. The film just didn’t work.
Me oh my I don't want to lose it
Benjarong, which means "five colors" in Sanskrit, is a traditional style of hand-painted Thai porcelain.
Yes, I’m talking about fantasy sports. Fake sports. Not real. But real in the sense that they are based on the outcomes of games that actually happen. Fantasy managers handpick their players and the destiny of the team rests on the players’ statistical production throughout the regular season of their respective sports. I personally love fantasy sports because they are a great way to study the players and statistics of the game, however they promote individuality and force fans to cheer for outrageous outcomes of games.
When you break up after seven months
“Yeah, I heard about it alright and I think it’s ridiculous,” he laughs. “They come in with all sorts of negligée and lingerie and it looks great. It adds a bit of glamour to the dole queue. A bit of positivity. Why not?”
If one is not devotionally inclined the other paths of yoga are good to follow, eventually, one will have a spiritual experience. This will lead one straight to Bhakti, for one will experience and realize something otherwise not known to them before. It matters not which way one goes about it, all paths of yoga merge eventually.
Stir together the flour, the wheat germ, the salt, and the baking soda.
Each year, for few days previous to Valentine’s, we write little love notes to each other and put them inside our boxes. Notes to say why we love each other. (We do something similar for Thanksgiving and put the leaves into a small bowl or make it into a Thankful Tree.) This time, we write reasons we love each other. They make such a beautiful little notes!
Skills Kids Can Use Right Away
Remote control weight: 210g
I wasn't sure what I wanted to cover today or even if I was going to cover anything. I haven't finished another new book just yet, nor have I read anything else the past couple days. But as I was sitting here drinking my Cafe Mocha made with my new espresso machine, I was studying my worldbuilding notes for my trogg and wizard story. No more putting off figuring out the rules for magic. The wizard has been backed into a corner and has to start explaining things to the trogg girl. She wasn't allowed to learn the societal laws regarding magic before she got cursed, and after the curse, the only things she's learned has been from overhearing things. Not exactly reliable.
all know who the random winner
"Thank You" to everyone who applied.
Red's Hot Chocolate
And that's it for now! I'll be back with the other cards in a couple days... hope you'll consider joining me for this fun card class on Tuesday night! We'll be playing with paper, flowers, stamps, dies and more... bring a friend for an enjoyable evening!
The photo for this card has been used a couple of times by Topps. Here is the other version:
Sweet Rainbow outdoor scene....enjoy
One defense utilized by Jacob’s lawyers is that he had a genetic propensity for violence, just like his grandfather, who is currently incarcerated for murdering a young girl. Landay included just enough information to thicken the plot without consuming the book with the theme . I found the concept extremely interesting, especially given that one of my favorite movies is “The Bad Seed” – which deals with the same question. Landay ends the book by revealing whether Jacob truly was the murderer and whether he is predisposed to violence. How his parents respond to that truth was a creative conclusion.
Dr. King understood a lot about America, including the fact that convincing people to do something because it was right is not an easy thing. To begin with a lot of people have different ideas about what right is. I am firmly convinced that some of those Klansmen they used to interview on television in the 1960s were quite sure they were doing what was right by trying to keep blacks in their place. I am equally firmly convinced that the people who are working daily for that same goal today believe they are doing the right thing.
The Man and I talked about it, and bared our bleeding hearts to each other, and decided to go for it in a moment of quick decision-making. (Well, actually, he had no idea I was doing it, until I called him from the dealership saying "I've got my pen poised above my checkbook; should I buy a car?")
In this chapter we also have proof that, from the very beginning, God required sacrifices from one’s labors, although no command from God to do so was included. But not only did God demand part of one’s earnings, but He judged them. I imagine it working something like Iron Chef, where each are given points for presentation, originality, and taste.
For concert band we highly recommend Armed Forces – The Pride of America, arranged by Larry Clark and Greg Gilpin. This is the only arrangement available for either concert or marching band that pays tribute to ALL 5 service branches. It also includes settings of the Pledge of Allegiance, America the Beautiful, and the Star-Spangled Banner. This distinctive arrangement has optional 2, 3, or 4-part choral, and string sets available.
I picked up papers, today. I'll have to get those graded before Wednesday, and I'll need to grade blogs sometime within that time frame. I could tell, even as I collected papers, that one of the ones who's done piss-poor work all semester has totally failed yet again--his paper doesn't even come within shouting distance of being remotely related to the type of paper they were supposed to write, and I doubt he'll be turning in any revisions any time soon.
Just post a link to this contest on your Facebook. But first--go to the Breathless Reads page and, if you haven't yet, like them. This isn't a requirement, I just think it'd be nice to do it--since Penguin did put together the tour and everything, and this is a way of showing them you like the tour and the books. Anyway, if you like the Breathless Reads page, then when you post about it on Facebook, you can type @Breathless Reads in your post, and it will link back to them so that (a) other people can show Penguin their appreciation and (b) you're gonna make Penguin feel all kinds of warm and fuzzy that people are linking back to them and sharing the love.
Hello, this is Martin from the Environmental Stewardship and Sustainability Office. Our office is hosting a pledge completion between the environmental RSOs. The purpose is to encourage members of the green clubs to outreach to new people while showing support for campus sustainability. The winning RSO will get $50 towards their Earth Day promotional handout or activity (see rules).
Mayall: And it’s so fucking English. You guys love the English so much over here, that I think there’s some kind of connection.
Total playing time: 23:36
Please reach out to me to learn your company’s Return on Disability® Rating.
Was it fortune or fame? Did I knit up my whole stash? Meet the Pope? Have another baby? Go on a real date with my husband? Get a maid?
Please send your bio and photograph and let me know why you would like to join our team of amazing scrappers!
For the “Piss” video, PANTERA, which can be seen below, put out a call through their Facebook page for fans to submit home videos of them rocking out to the band or attend a video shoot in Los Angeles. The resulting video is an amazing collection of fans of all ages, from around the world, moshing, jumping, punching, kicking, and just plain rocking out to PANTERA. The video, directed by Zach Merck, also features some amazing slow-motion shots that recreate the face punch from the iconic cover of “Vulgar Display Of Power”.
Sensational.
Mie Ongklok is a famous dish from Wonosobo, a regency in Central Java. Pak Muhadi (Mr. Muhadi) is said to be the creator of this dish. Mi Ongklok is made of yellow noodles and some vegetables. If many noodle dishes use green mustard, Mi Ongklok calls for cabbage and chives. We are to shake the noodles and veggies with a strainer (traditionally made from bamboo) while we are blanching them in hot or boiling water. That is why this dish is called "ongklok" - ongklok is the Javanese word of "shake". The blanced ingredients are arranged in a bowl, and then added with two kinds of gravy (they are called loh) and some condiments. Sambal or ground fresh bird eye chilies is sometimes used to add the heat for spicy food lovers :D. The popular companions of Mi Ongklok are beef sate/satay, tempe kemul (fried tempeh coated in flour batter), and tofu chips (Wikipedia).
The author had, unwisely, just died and would be unable to do any publicity for the book.
What to do with a God who bends down to meet us?
in reverse
If immigration is part of some right wing conspiracy to usher in private health care by financially undermining Canada's publicly funded health care system then no one can accuse it of not doing it's job.
The Eisen Agency
3. When you talk about your friends “anonymously” on Facebook, we know exactly who you’re talking about. People are smarter than you think they are. Stop posting passive-aggressive statuses about the myriad of ways your friends disappoint you.
Something more that appeals to me, as a gardener, is the gorgeous, luxuriant garden surrounding the castle where Spring and Summer flowers all bloom together in a mad rush, cascading down the hillside - one day I'll have one just like it!
First-up, Topps 2012 Heritage variation card (numbered to #/1963). I have not been focussed on collecting the Heritage sets so still didn't have this one.
the hardest part of transcribing any of this is that the experience is in the details. it is in the people you pass on the side of the street selling produce, the smells and sights as you drive through town, the little orphan boy one pew over trying to capture your attention during a sermon in creole, the smiles and stories of everyone you meet. it is in the beauty and hope of this country that is so close to ours.
Poets don’t get paid (often), but there’s no poetry shortage. The future is going to be filled with amateurs, and the truly talented and persistent will make a great living. But the days of journeyman writers who make a good living by the word–over. (My emphasis.)
I read a great deal, not just yaoi, not just manga, but fiction of all shapes and sizes including fantasy and science fiction. Hands down, Naono Bohra is the most original thinker, the one with the stories I've never seen before, concepts I never contemplated, twists I never expected. Even her stories that don't deal with the "fantastic" like demons and werewolves and dragons and vampires seem to add original twists and turns or depths that bring them out of the common way whether we're dealing with salarymen or high school students.
A maid bore the tidings of our arrival away into the echoing distances of the house, and while we waited we cleared our throats noisily. Then she came back, and the door was left ajar for us, and we were bidden to begin. We brought no music, the carols were in our heads. ‘Let’s give ’em “Wild Shepherds”,’ said Jack. We began in confusion, plunging into a wreckage of keys, of different words and tempo; but we gathered our strength; he who sang loudest took the rest of us with him, and the carol took shape if not sweetness.
(248) 4MY-TEAM
I’m not making commercial for it without reason though. There is an ongoing discussion in there on the question of state and “church” (church more being synagogue or mosque in this discussion), and one of the participants asked me for my opinion. I promised an answer earlier, but I have to admit that I’ve simply been pondering on it for some days now, not feeling that I could formulate an answer clearly, which would express my thoughts, without it getting way too long for the thread in there.
It is a compelling and terrifying thought to believe that dreadful beasts walk amongst us disguised as us and indistinguishable from our own, but committed to our demise. Indeed the idea of alien creatures, or different species, taking on the form of humans in order to achieve their wicked aims is an evocative one and exists in many cultures and legends.
Place almonds in blender/food processor with water
“Redemption”
But the arena could surely open once, on a day with less traffic.
1/4 cup chopped fresh cilantro
Hostage said he understands there are still concerns about the aircraft; however, he explained that there’s always a certain amount of risk involved, and the risk must be balanced with the requirement for the capability.
I turned and shifted back into my car. My body started to buzz. The door opened and a tall, slinky man with thin hair and a leather jacket came out with a gun pointed at the spot where I just escaped. He looked around, even walked a few feet up and down the street before he went back inside.
- Smoked Trout Filet
We were also granted SSI benefits for Rylee this month. What a blessing!
I started taking a look around my home. Questions began to overwhelm me like:
Cook on low for 6-8 hours, stirring one or twice
We obviously know that in fact we cannot always be whatever we resolve to be and that failure is always an option. But both of these statements speak to a mindset that will drive us to be “more” that we otherwise could have been or would have been.
The still shot below was the first image seen on the heels of “Don’t just listen to me, listen to these happy Progressive customers“.
Favorite things from the room:
So can I
This is another Pinterest find - I just LOVE pinterest. :)
The Brazilian Statistical Institute (IBGE) announced Friday that unemployment hit 5.7% for the month of February.
Ariel Waldman, Lynn, Marianne Masculino and Cindy Li created the CupcakeCamp phenomenon.
but my heart beholds the grace.
Flatware - Old Company Plate Signature
that their argument is floored.
I love them!!
The only thing that can stop you? That pesky guy in the mirror again.
Harder than it seems sometimes, chicks.
and I feel exactly the same about her in this book. I know that Agatha Christie’s Miss Marple’s talent as a detective lies in the fact she is unobtrusive, blending into the background where she can conveniently overhear relevant snippets of conversations but she still has character; in the early novels she’s a gleeful gossip and not an especially nice woman before Christie softened her down and made her more “fluffy”. In an e-mail Ruth said this to me:
No piece of paper can be folded in half more than 7 times.
7. If you could choose any writer to be your Man Friday, who would that be? Stephen King. the imagination of the man would save my sanity.
Bafana Bafana (video) – Producer
The comments here do some good to express how this could be considered either good or bad. . .
Commercial break from Harry!
Recall the outcry two decades ago that spotted owls were on the brink of extinction. The resulting action to protect them shut down a great swath of the timber industry in the northwest. It turned out that barred owls were preying on their cousins, again a natural competition between species. The Obama administration wants to set aside millions of acres to protect the spotted own and to authorize the killing of barred owls!
And while the figs on my tree aren't ripe yet, there are hundreds of them coming soon - if the birds don't get them first. So much as I love figs, I'm not paying $1.50 each at the market.
Afore ye really ‘preciate the things ye lef’ behind,
That’s respect.
84. Yuh tel tara and tara tell tara. When you tell a friend a secret soon everyone knows because your friend will tell another friend.
Although she would encourage me to draw and give me supplies, she didn't seem to approve of the things I would choose to draw later on- the characters from comic strips or from cartoons on TV.
By Nicholas Maurice Young, Ph. D.
Teachers are responsible for educating kids, not raising them. They, the teachers, are responsible for transmitting FACTS of a subject, to include the necessary supporting information of the facts, not opinions.
Love my hubby so much!
I would say my favourite collective myths are our own Celtic ones. Walking through a British woodland or standing on a rugged coast, I can still sense the atmosphere of these tales even today, probably because the stories are more earthly bound than those of the Gods and Goddesses of other cultures.
I’ve always been a believer that great advertising grows out of the product. This film (No, it’s not a 30 sec spot, but if I say it’s an ad, it’s a fucking ad) nearly six minutes in a single take, with the incomparable Robert Carlisle, IS the product. The history, the character, the ambience. It’s enough to make me almost give up gin.
… unless … well …
Some of the other Papers currently in preparation for the Conference include:
Ever since I discovered that Italians traditionally studded their focaccia dough with red or green grapes instead of just sundried tomatoes, I’ve been on the occasional focaccia con frutta-making streak. However the variations I’ve concocted, have morphed into flatbread closer to a dessert pizza.
You have keep getting up every time you get knocked down and come back at it with everything you have, even when you don’t want to. If you will choose it, if you will commit, pursue, and follow-through, those prison walls will come down and you will create for yourself the life you have had hoped fate would hand you.
Lt. General John “Mark” M. Curran, USA (Ret.)
‘Jesus does not advocate revolt or material conflict with these kings and great ones. He reverses the question, and as so often challenges his interlocutors: “But you…it must not be the same among you.” In other words, do not be so concerned about fighting kings. Let them be. Set up a marginal society which will not be interested in such things, in which there will be no power, authority, or hierarchy. Do not do things as they are usually done in society, which you cannot change. Create another society on another foundation.’
No more help for Yankees?
This was easily the most remarked upon painting by the kids. There was disagreement about whether she was a queen or a princess (she was, in fact, a princess). Some of them felt the dark figure was there to protect her, others thought he was her enemy. In the background is her castle, we decided, or perhaps her "city." I tried to get them to speculate about the book in her hand, but there was at first a lot of shrugged shoulders. Then Sasha clarified matters decisively, "That's the Virgin Mary. My Nana told me all about her." I asked, "Oh, I wonder what kind of book the Virgin Mary would be reading?" She thought, then replied, "Probably a book of prayers." This, I thought, was a special insight, one that was really not too far off the mark. Often solitary female figures in paintings from the middle ages turn out to be the Madonna, and while I'm not knowledgeable about Catholic saints, this one sounds like she's right up there near the top of the hierarchy.
Paul Sears I'd love to learn more about painting or drawing. I've really never had the hand/eye coordination. Even my penmanship is bad!
At-Large Bid: Metro Atlantic Athletic Conference
1 AP Reset Scroll: Resets all points which were into STR, DEX, INT and LUK to the required amount of you job. The point put into HP and MP are kept.
Most of my teacher photos are the posed end-of-year class photos, of me with each year’s charges. The ones above, were taken about twenty years ago by my teaching assistant, probably to show my Mum what I got up to in the classroom. It was a small village school on Salisbury Plain in Wiltshire, which my own children also attended. Those pupils in the picture were lovely girls and now of course they’ll be all grown-up, perhaps with children of their own. I wonder if any of them became teachers.
There’s only one thing Vampire Queen Betsy Taylor hates more than the threat of hosting a traditional Thanksgiving dinner (after all, how traditional is her family?), and that’s trying to get through the Book of the Dead without going insane. Every time she’s tried reading it she just gets blindsided-until this time, when the devil strikes a bargin. She offers Betsy a chance to get through the cursed (literally!) thing cover to cover and finally discover all its mysteries. There’s just one teensy little catch.
The air feels different. The sky looks different. The birds are returning and singing their joyful songs.
There's no other way in explaining the BIZARRE renewed legal assault
Being a lawyer himself, Randy Singer expertly writes stories with so much detail the reader gets a touch of a lawyer’s real life when reading his books. Add to this a little suspense, drama, romance, danger, fear, and determined characters taking on the most dangerous and difficult cases, and you have a Number 1 novel that will blow you away when you read it.
The next chapter of the industry’s history will answer questions about that gap in insurance coverage, as well as some serious challenges on the legislative horizon. Will there be continued attacks on life insurance’s favorable tax status in the wake of the industry’s increased focus on the affluent market? Is a universal fiduciary standard on the way, plus a possible switch from state to federal regulation of the insurance industry?
We all have private ails. The troublemakers are they who need public cures for their private ails.
Dear PTB's
It says some plants experience micro-gravity in Shambhala
(acn) The world premiere of the musical Cinco Heroes
God…does…do
All I say is just forget it
CALLIOPE: I know.
For today's Retro Cafe Art design piece, I knew I would be using this cute tv piece cause I love watching certain television. My favorite shows this season are Once, Game of Thrones, PBS Downton Abbey- now Sherlock, Lost Girl and Mad Men. What are you watching? And then for me it's all about the story and getting lost in another world another time.....this is probably why I adore reading books too. Now that I think about it, my art has such a narrative quality too and always tells a story! LOL.
5 podcasts listened to...
You can see the one on the left doesn't stand as nice and laying flat it is easy to see how much of a difference there is in having that extra weld on the top. I do think the one on the left would be perfect, however, for a gift tag because you would be punching through both layers and adding some fiber to attach to the gift.
Makes about 16 pieces
I wish you all a wonderful weekend! I hope your weather is beautiful, sunny and you get to spend time with the people you want to! Many blessings!
the stimulated strength beneath us, between us,
13. CLARRIE GRIMMETT (AUS) Legbreak Googly (1911-41)
But inside, Maddie's always been some sort of rebel, never fully satisfied with what the cyber-world has given her. All this is proven when Maddie reveals her past.
Prior to working for the company, which he has been serving for over 3 years now, he had also worked as a Communication Skills Trainer specializing in Near-hire Training for Communication and Customer Service Skills for StaffRight Solutions, an HR consultancy, recruiting, and training firm based in Makati City and just recently, Cebu. Here, he was helping out in scouting prospective endorsees to partner call center clients by observing the recruitment personnel’s interviews and helping them assess the candidates’ coachability in terms of Customer Service and English Communication skills. He was also facilitating Communication Skills Training for the organization on Neutral Accent, Communication Skills, and American Culture; Geography; and Time Zones.
who was afraid of dogs and snowmen,
Relyn was kind enough to share a little bit of her commute with me, so I thought it would be fun to return the favor...
I wanted to find a table to sit at so I’d be in close proximity to as many people as possible, but a combination of poor luck and judgement found me a seat between two tables of people speaking foreign languages I didn’t understand. On one side, an asian couple (Korean possibly? I’m terrible with languages but it didn’t sound like Japanese) and on the other, I couldn’t make it out. They could’ve been Spanish but I had no clue. It drove home how ignorant I am about so much in the world, and how I’d like to be less so.
When I turned 14, I decided it was time I start learning real things on the piano. No more kid-oriented things that had no musical significance (in essence, or for me). I went to the music store and urged my mother to let me get a big lavender book of Frédéric Chopin's Complete Ballades, Impromptus & Sonatas. I had no idea what a Ballade, Impromptu, or Sonata was, and I can't remember if I even knew who Chopin was. I must have, or I wouldn't have been so interested in buying it. I opened the book and could not read a single line, even without being at the piano, but I knew that I MUST learn something out of it, even if it took me a century, I would do it. I bought it and took it home. I had just gotten a new piano for my birthday, (and I still love the shit out of that piano), so I was anxious to start playing some real music on it. The first piece in the big lavender book was Ballade No. 1 in G minor, Op. 23. To this day, it is my favorite piece of Chopin's music. I cannot find a single fault with it. I was able to play the first page no problem, and would often play it for my mother while she sat outside on the porch because it was just so beautiful. I remember turning the page and deciding to go ahead and tackle the whole thing - who would want to hear just the first page? I learned the second page, the third page, and then on the fourth page I realized that I had probably gotten really over my head. So I skipped pages four and five. Six wasn't quite as bad, so I picked that up as well, and while seven was tough I liked to pretend I could get through it. I went through the rest of the thirteen pages like this until I could safely say I "learned" this piece, for better or for worse. I played it every day, over and over again. I started at all different places, almost never the beginning, until I memorized virtually every single note in the entire piece (except, of course, pages four and five). I still have journals in which I documented my progress with the piece, writing how badly I want to learn the whole thing, how badly I want to memorize it and play it straight through by myself. I wanted to internalize the piece and be completely consumed by it. I bought a recording of the piece played by Ashkenazy or something and would sit with the score in my lap and turn it all the way up. I didn't know the terms with which one would describe the things Ashkenazy did with the music, such as rubato and rallentando or a tempo. I just took a pencil and wrote things like "nothing too fancy at first" and "some tone quality, but not full-force" and... what else... "bring this out" and "play fast" (I even wrote, literally, "take time plz" at one part) and notes saying to sing out the melody as if I were a singer. I was coaching myself to play the piece exactly like the recording. I was reminding a future-version of myself to play as I hoped someday to play. I was so encompassed by the piece, but there was always something missing. I had a few teachers hear me play it, and they never discouraged me but there were definitely some wrong notes that I had learned due to wanting to learn as much as possible over a short period of time. As I grew up, however, and moved to other pieces... I did stop playing it. I stopped opening up my big lavender book, I stopped spending hours on a single piece until my hands screamed for rest. I stopped drilling passages that I thought were simply IMPOSSIBLE to be conquered, stopped playing and re-playing sections that my hands were just not large or agile enough to handle. I moved on. Aside from some pieces that I do not care for, I barely played any Chopin again.
I’d say I’m experiencing a similar feeling these days, now that I’m on my own. Yes, my lust for life has been reanimated, but so has my hunger for producing and refining my life’s work. I am a machine, finally pursuing all the projects I set down years ago, building my portfolio and taking on freelance gigs to build my professional experience. I’m working diligently on my website for creatives (my next big opus) and I plan on launching it next month. Living on my own has revitalized my motivation, jolted my creativity and pushed me to an amazing momentum I haven’t ridden in a very, very long time.
How very true. And, that’s exactly how I have felt many a time!
“No, really, I need to puke.” They dashed for a bucket and it got to me just in time. I threw up all the precious tincture. And continued to feel gushes of blood. It was suggested that I needed to wee. So I got up and, supported, went to the loo after passing our baby boy to Lloyd.
Now I am quite the conversationalist and can happily chirrup to anyone who cares to listen but given the state I was in, I think I went a bit onto autopilot as we wandered around the market. After a brief pause in my gabbling, Jackie piped up and asked if I wanted to know what she had made for me and for a split second, I wondered what the hell was she talking about. But then I felt the weighty white freezer bag in my hand, glanced down and suddenly remembered what we were actually doing there. "Oh God, yes, tell me", I replied, a touch embarrassed. And so Jackie did. Except I didn't understand any of the words. 'Lardy, plasticky, bolognesey? Terry and Sue? Who is this Terry and Sue? Did she just say ladyfingers?' were some of the phrases and questions that ran through my confused mind. But I did catch that she had made me some proper Italian lemonade, which threw me a lifeline. "Ah, you like to cook Italian then?" Jackie nodded, postulating that this made her a bad Chinese girl before zeroing in on the Turkish pizza wraps that are sold on The Iskele stall. So I bought two squeaky halloumi filled wraps for our lunch and off we went to the nearby park. Sitting down on the grass was a nice respite, what with the slight drop in atmospheric pressure on my aching temple and I could finally focus on having a nice chat about life, the theatre (turns out we've both trod the boards, darlink) and blogging. Alas, it didn't last for long as the baking heat on my bonce started to pop my neurons like popcorn and so I had to make my excuses to get to work. Jackie didn't seem too bothered, agreeing that maybe I should get indoors as I did look like I used to be a 'ginger'. I thanked her for her contribution and left her basking and peddled back to the office, back to my desk.
“There were three chairs around a table and, presumably, a bed upstairs. At the front door there was a row of eight hooks, with just one jacket hanging here. She had lost absolutely all her possessions. She felt she was being punished”
努力寻找目标
My friends had been constant companions for my husband and I before they made that giant leap across the country. We had dinner together on a regular basis. Vicky is a terrific cook and she seemed to love spontaneous get-togethers which was a good thing because I wasn't much of a planner. We lived only a few doors down from each other when they lived in California. Vicky was a stay at home mom like myself and Howard was a professor at the local university. I'm sure Howard and Vicky could never know the grief I felt when they moved away. I find it is difficult to find friends where the husbands and the wives are as mutually connected as we were.
He is now 16 months old.
To the victor go the spoils is the old saying. Well, our caller won the spot. Apparently the other driver drove off, seeking a parking spot elsewhere. Unbeknownst to our caller, the supposed loser went back to the caller's car and wrote in the dust on the back of her car, "I CAN'T DRIVE!" Our caller saw this and was infuriated. She called the police from the parking lot, alleging vandalism. We had no units to respond. She then drove home and called insisting a unit be sent. No units available. A little while longer, and she calls a third time, demanding an officer be sent now, or she will drive to the police station.
Unfortunately Ryan, has had enough coconut lately it seems, and only wanted the icecream, and Sam tried it – but preferred only the icecream as well – which was fine it meant more for us (I had to eat the extra one I’d dished up) But I’ve learnt my lesson for the next few weeks at least – “Cool it with the coconut”. So let’s hope they choose a less equatorial country next week!
Every single day, I’m amazed at the creativity and talent that the people around me possess.
Friend: *Wearily* What?
- 100 g ground almond
Overall this was an okay book. There isn't technically anything wrong with it. I just found the characters to be lackluster, the story predictable, and the mystery slow-moving and difficult to stay engaged with. So far I remain unimpressed with all of the Siren YA books I have read. I did think that Lost Voices by Sarah Porter was better than this book but not a ton better. I won't be reading any more of this series.
“But,” says Lewis, “there is another step. A good comic can tell a racial joke to people of that racial group and make them laugh AND he can tell the same joke to people who are not of that ethnic group and make them laugh. If you can’t tell the joke and get laughs when there are no people of that racial group there, then you shouldn’t tell the joke. You should not tell the joke because it will make the audience feel uncomfortable.”
Dalek Beach Party - Wheels Came Off 1:56
X: The Man With X-Ray Eyes will leave the typical audience members watching the end credits and thinking about not only the scary scenes they have witnessed, and a great Ray Milland performance, but also a film whose basic idea was this - even if man can challenge the ideas of mankind and the balances of nature, should he? And at what costs?
It was definitely a good time.
turned into weeks of silence.
Reading the first 18 pages had me going Ooohing and Awhing....(Spelling???)
“Just imagine the kind of organizations that exist in this region and then imagine them with the proliferation of nuclear weapons. That’s not a safe world to live in,” Ben-Zion concluded. “So I think there’s an international interest in preventing Iran from getting that capability.”
So today as I was coming home to check on the kids, I meet a man holding a 3 foot elf in his arms. he told me him and the elf were getting divorced I asked him "why she's cute" he then promtly handed her to me and said here have her. Of course I couldn't resist playing a prank on the children. I stood her up and knocked on the door and disappeared into the stairwell ( which is right next to our apartment door) I then "watched" as Tony came to the door I could hear him at the door but didn't opnen it right away. Then he went back to the living room. Of coruse I knoked again and this time he slowly opened the door, then went back into the apartment, I could here talking and again the door slowly opened and out popped Brycen he got on his knees and talked to the elf then picked her up and took her into the apartment!!! It was the funniest thing I had a good laugh!!
See Lewis Schaffer live every Tuesday and Wednesday at the Source Below. Free admission but you will be guilted into giving me money to get out. Reserve at http://bit.ly/londonfreeshow
These things have different meanings to different people. I believe in people. It's ridiculous .... I know ..... but, I believe in people having fun and experiencing joy ...... and I think it is okay to play pretend to get there sometimes.
Next, I used a card from the Silhouette America Store. I resized it and then I used papers from the Authentique Journey collection. Used my copics again for the coloring.
Combining their love of ska, reggae, punk, and rock, The Crombies may be the finest American 2-Tone All-Star tribute band I've ever seen or heard! Founded by vocalist Mike Park (ex-Deal’s Gone Bad, Lord Mike’s Dirty Calypsonians) and Deal’s Gone Bad guitarist Dave Simon, the six-piece band perform fantastic, pitch perfect versions of songs by The Specials, Madness, Bad Manners, The Beat and more.
On the level of populations, the sort of crudely manipulative rhetoric that divides an elite 1% from an oppressed 99%, which was made popular last year by the Occupy movement, is a formidable barrier to understanding. An empire that tried to manage its affairs along those lines would fall in weeks. From ancient Rome to contemporary Washington DC, “divide and conquer” has always been the basic strategy of empire, and the classic way to do that in modern times is to hand out shares of wealth and privilege unequally to different sectors of the population. The British empire turned this into an art form, using arbitrary privileges and exclusions of various kinds to keep ethnic groups in each subject nation so irritated at one another that they never got around to uniting against the British. From the simmering rivalry between India and Pakistan, through the troubles of Northern Ireland, to the bitter mutual hatreds of Israelis and Arabs in what used to be British Palestine, the ethnic hatreds whipped up deliberately for the sake of Britain’s imperial advantage remain a live issue today.
Some folk who were standing around me on the Thames Embankment on New Year's Eve, waiting for 2012 to roll in, and the fireworks to start.
We toss back a peace frisbee to you and yours. Our "there" is Wyoming...sunshine trying to (peacefully) melt away a layer of the ten inches of white stuff that (peacefully) fell in the last 24 (peaceful) hours.
Single Channel HD Video
DVDs: Steven Soderbergh's Haywire seems to have gotten a lot of flack online, usually about his casting of a non-actor, mixed martial arts star Gina Carano, in the lead role. I have no trouble with it, personally. Soderbergh has been casting a lot of non-actors lately, to basically play versions of themselves. Carano doesn't emote much, but neither is she terrible. She's pretty hot in this and the martial arts are outstanding, with every performer pretty much doing their own frenzied fighting. In fact, this spy thriller has many of the sensibilities of Hong Kong cinema, which you know I appreciate. Action heroes chosen for their physical abilities and brute charisma, not their acting chops; a lyrical use of music, filters and editing; and character revealed through action and plot. I'm also a fan of spy thrillers that show off actual spycraft, and Haywire feels legit in that sense as well. Haywire is a slick, structurally interesting action movie that I hope leads to more for Carano. The DVD features interviews with the entire cast, a longer feature on Carano herself - from MMA to film star - and all the web-based promos that essentially give away most of the twists (maybe it's no wonder the film was reviled by some - they got spoiled!).
I know this post is after earth day but it might help with ideas for next year!
Don’t let the lack of star names put you off. Let’s face it Liverpool probably couldn’t attract a star name at the moment anyway, if you want someone who can put the ball in the net when you need a goal most these are them.
We’ve been there lots of times in the past and we get all our chocolate goodies there (molds, peanuts, cookies – you can add to your molten and molded chocolates) so we really know what to buy and how much of each item. Our goal that day was to make our own version of the chocolate “Crunch”, so we got some Rice Crispies, Regular Milk Chocolate, and a couple of heart chocolate molds.
It has been so hot the last few days. We've been experiencing 35° and 36° temperature. My active three year old has been her usual self and is playing actively indoors and outdoors with her cousins. To keep her feeling fresh, I kept all her leggings, pants and t-Shirts. I make her wear summer girls dresses everyday. These dresses are not only pretty but it doesn't make her feel sweaty and hot the whole day.
2 tablespoons ghee or butter.
The doggy bone that merchants and planters were able to throw to the lower classes to nibble on has been able to hold for the last 236 years. The classes, however, have changed.
Now, just as I was getting ready to show a live streaming video of my latest gynecology exam, researchers at the University of Kent have to go and ruin things. A recent study sought out to find whether there is a seemingly instinctual attraction to the color of women’s genitals during sexual arousal. (Not to be confused with the same study Fonzie and Joey are conducting in their basements).
Sanitation Department to Resume Limited Refuse and Recycling Collection Tonight, While Continuing Snow Removal Clean Up of Saturday's Storm
